
                   Awful Awful Teacher!!! I was completely excited about taking this class until I took it with him!!  Case studies were a waste of time if he didn't call on you to present yours..I completed all case studies and raised my hand every class period to present..he never called on me so I got a '0' for that grade! Rest of grades based off of 3 tests only
                
                   Not a bad class.  Case studies were complete waste of time.  Grade completely dependent on 3 tests, made it hard to get an A.
                
                   Leaves class before it is even close to being over. 
                
                   You won't learn or miss much in class, but be prepared for a killer group project with no guidence or specific grading rubric. With only one solo presentation and a few MyEducator assignments, the content is very easy but the professor just seems like he doesn't know which direction is up. 
                
                   You have to ask him what is due or he won't tell you. If you don't want to ask keep up with the syllabus. 
                
                   Dr. Berry is a very creative in her teaching skills, and communication is very clear when speaking with the students. I as a student understand clearly and anytime I have a question Dr. Berry never hesitates to answer and help me better understand. 
                
                   Great teacher 
                
                   Great professor that gives good projects. Makes students interact with each other which is usually fun. She explains in very good detail and gives you opportunities for extra credit.
                
                   Very interactive with students and clearly explains information and projects to us.
                
                   Great professor and makes classes fun 
                
                   Dr. Berry is a pretty great professor. Down to earth, simple to understand and relatable. Her lectures and assignment aren't just work you have to complete, they're -must-know-for-life information. She is always available to critique rough drafts which is an opportunity for an easy A for the caring student. , try in this class and you will succeed 
                
                   I wished I'd seen the previous review before taking her. Weekly 500 word discussion board with 2-250 word replies,1500 word monthly writing assignments and a COMPREHENSIVE FINAL. Lots to read. Too bad she takes the "my way or the highway" attitude for conflict resolution/ negotiation. Doesn't care about student's personal issues. Take someone else
                
                   Weekly discussions are actually papers. She will expect a 500 word paper with citations, plus 2 - 250 word responses to other classmates every week. She also expects you to read several supplemental papers that are about 30 pages in length each. So expect to read 100+ pages every week in total.
                
                   Dr. Philpot is hands down the most exceptional instructor I've had at WT. Her number one priority is you doing well in her class. She will work with you every day and make sure you're successful. I would take her for every class at WT if I could.
                
                   Picky with writing assignments, takes long to answer emails sometimes.
                
                   great prof!
                
                   Loved every class I had with Dr. Pearson
                
                   It takes a lot of time, but the class is halfway interesting and not that hard.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   If you rely on lectures to pass a class, don't go to his class. He claims his MGT 330 is the &quot;easiest&quot; BBA principal course. It is not. I have a hard time understand what he is trying to say. Just a warning...
                
                   He got lost even more than I did.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Really need to read the book to do well on tests, but her lectures are interesting.  She knows the subject matter very well.  I took the course a few years ago and still remember stuff.  If you're interested in learning it's a good course.
                
                   Mrs. Turner is a laywer, so she knows exactly what she is talking about. She wants class participation to show that everyone is paying attention. Grades fairly easy on projects, but you'd better know the vocabulary for tests as she has scenerios for questions and you have to determine which concept(s) is/are being used.
                
                   Took the intersession course.  It was awesome.  Helpful prof and interesting material.  Highly reccomended.
                
                   Not a bad class, just have to take notes and study vocab. Majority of test is vocab and lecture stuff.
                
                   She is snotty, she likes students to suck up.
                
                   Friend took online, I took in class, she didn't explain things well in class and gave too much busy work online. Advise to take in class and just read the book instead of listening to her.
                
                   Funny instructor. I actually learned. However, her lectures sounds like she is in a court room.
                
                   I'm a student who isn't one of those really smart ones. At first I thought that I  wouldn't like this professor but in the end,  all you need to do is write journals and do the final project. If she teaches other class I would take them. Even though you never know what she speaks about in class, she puts everything online so it's self explanatory. 
                
                   Do the readings, do your journal in response to the reading and the final project, and you're in good shape. She takes attendance every class, and uses a lot of videos in her lectures to emphasize the topics that are being covered. When she opens the floor for class discussion,  make your voice heard, it makes class that much more interesting.
                
                   Instructor was not communicative when emails were sent. She does not participate and takes forever to grade anything. Would never take a class with her again.
                
                   Emails sent were replied with only instructions how to reach him through course mail.  When contacted correctly, only stated instructions are located within the module and NEVER answered any question that was directly asked.  So far, the first 3 module assignments are ungraded including term project proposal.  Nothing to gauge work against. BAD
                
                   Hard course, lots of reading, papers and discussions. No help from teacher.DO NOT TAKE THIS COURSE
                
                   Awful communication and little of no feedback. She didn't participate in the class discussion and didn't provide any guidance as to how to improve. Grades appear arbitrary!
                
                   Diversity course online. Don't take a course with her!She was never available unless you emailed her. She never posted in class or posted new module notices.  Didn't help our team when we needed help.  Lots of reading, writing, quizzes, team projects.Lot of work for one class.Wrote in a dry, haughty tone, like we were nothing.
                
                   Took Diversity online. Don't take her! Professor was never there, never commented, never put up notices re: new modules.Required a lot of iting and journaling the 3 texts, and quizzes on texts.  2 team projects.  Horrible experience.  Not until a student complained to ESC did the professor finally start showing up in class.  Spoke down to us.
                
                   Took for Diversity in the Workplace. Professor never responded to emails except when sending your grade back. We had an issue with a student in the class and she did absolutely nothing about it. Worked my butt off in this class for 65's & 70's. Would NOT recommend this professor
                
                   If there is a problem I have with this professor, it is that she takes forever getting our grades back. She is a fair grader though.
                
                   Attendance is not mandatory, but you should go to class (large lectures & small group meetings)every day, because attendance counts for about 50% of your grade. Quizzes and assignments are relatively easy. All of the assignments are due on the same day at the end of the semester, so you have a lot of time to finish them.
                
                   Class is an easy A if you attend lectures and complete online quizzes. Material is a breeze, but attendance is mandatory. No tests and no final. LOTS of projects. Including group projects. &quot;Peer group&quot; meeting can be fun and help take a break from the somewhat dull lectures. Textbook is pretty much pointless. Overall not that bad.
                
                   This class is an easy A, but it's kind of a pain to take. You have to buy several online subscriptions, go to every class, and suffer through pointless lectures. All lectures were a summary of online lectures that were also required.  Prof was nice and funny, but the class made everything kind of boring.
                
                   His projects can be hard, but only if you don't go to class. He solves all the projects in class so just bring your laptop and you'll do fine. He gives bonus points for going to class. The exams are easy if you study for them. The book is necessary to study for the test. He is a great prof and I would suggest him to anyone who needs this class.
                
                   He is annoying, his projects are  full of a lot of detail that have nothing to do with actually learning the software and he is not the guy to go to if things aren't working the way they should. Better yet, his own TA's have very little idea as to what he is looking for in the projects so you always get more then one answer to a question.
                
                   Professor Ammons is a hard prof to deal with but his class is pretty easy if you attend class. He gives you most of the criteria for the tests. The main thing you need to worry about our your 3 projects due throughout the semester. They require a lot of time but theyre easy. I would take him again.
                
                   This was one of my favorite classes ive taken in college. I had previous coding experience so this was the easiest class ive ever taken, but even if you do not Dr becker is a very good professor and explains things very well
                
                   Dr. Becker is the adviser for the MISY program. Going to class is a must bc any programs built in class are fair game during the exam. Really challenges your brain and teaches you to think in new ways. Flipped course, so you're expected to learn basics before lecture and work on problems in class. My favorite class this semester!
                
                   Prof. Curtsinger is one of the most unhelpful professors I have ever met. Walk into her office hours asking for clarification on an assignment. You will leave feeling more confused than when you walked in and praying the semester with her would just hurry up and end.
                
                   It's mostly Vocabulary so just read the book and know the terms and you will do fine. The only "tough" parts are the different Excel, Access and HTML assignments, but they are graded fairly easy. 
                
                   Great Professor. Very willing to help his students and give feedback. Participation is a major part of your grade so make sure you attend class!
                
                   Great professor! As long as you attend class, the exams are pretty straight forward but they do include a few essay questions so be prepared! Very willing to help his students. He will even help you out with your resume!
                
                   Great professor! He keeps  the lectures interesting. He can be a little bit tough on the grading, but you're an Aggie so high-quality work should be expected! Ask for his feedback on assignments and go to his office hours to look at your previous exams; he will help you out. As long as you put in a little effort you'll do fine!
                
                   Very fun, informative teacher. About half of the class days will be guest speakers that are usually decent however every once in a while you will get a terribly boring speaker that is either completely unprepared or just plain bad at speaking. All in all it's an easy class if you actually go to class, take notes, and study the tiniest bit.
                
                   Not a hard class, but she'll claim something isn't important and then put it on the test. Lots of guest speakers and when I asked if I could do anything to get my 79.35 to a B she said to accept the grade I got!
                
                   Very helpful, goes through material in a very logical way. I had an 8AM and I still liked her.
                
                   Only 2 tests: midterm and final, which together make up 80% of the course so if you do bad on one, you're screwed. I took this class in an honors section so it was smaller and he had a sign in sheet to track attendance. He's a nice guy, but not very fluent in English and it is so hard to understand him during his lectures most days.
                
                   No, Rangan is not easy.  That being said, he is easier than darcy.  I'd take him again.  Stat is a little difficult, and if I studied more I probably would have gotten an A.
                
                   Rangan is awesome! Super nice and makes the class really easy. Curves almost every test and there is no textbook or homework.
                
                   Great professor and interesting course!
                
                   
                
                   Follow the syllabus, post on the discussion boards frequently, and participate in class live sessions.  The workload wasn't bad.  The final was challenging but not overly so.  Very helpful during class live sessions.  She won't grade work during the course, but will provide feedback if asked.
                
                   No grades or feedback on the huge amount of work assigned.  Term is over and I'm not sure where I stand.
                
                   Zero grading through the term, changed syllabus halfway through the summer term and added a group project like she was handing out candy.  Required a group paper, individual paper, homework assignments, and group powerpoint every week.  Zero feedback on work submitted. It is the end of the semester and I don't know if I have an A or an F. Avoid!
                
                   A ridiculous amount of work with no grading or feedback.  Went an entire semester with no grades.  Produced hundreds of pages with zero feedback.  Final exam required 21 journal articles be read in addition to a final paper.  Absurd workload for a Summer course, and insulting that your work isn't commented on at all.  Avoid her.
                
                   WARNING!!! Do not choose this professor. Our 1st grades were not posted until 2 days before the end of the semester and had to get the Dean involved to get that much. There is a lot of work and the professor will not do what she promises. She promised numerous things that she never followed through with mostly pertaining to SAP, grades, and cases.
                
                   Left my job to complete this course. There will be 3 hw due every week through out the semester. Paper (10 pgs), SAP and DB.Plus, you have to finish some chapter HWs. Do not take this class if u r working or have other hard classes. Never graded anything, no timely reply.If u r stuck in SAP,u r finished. Even prof. doesn't know how to fix it.
                
                   Dr. Alexander is a very good professor, very helpful, responds to emails and makes sure that persons understand. Very flexible and understanding....I think because she has so many other classes lecturing at the same time, trying to return grades as promised would be extremely hard- not only for her but anyone else in her position. Very good person
                
                   Fast summer class, very unorganized.  She only provided grades for one assignment between the start of the class and the last day. She was ok, but it seemed like it would have been better to pick a few topics and concentrate on those instead of trying to cram 15 chapter of stuff into 4 weeks.
                
                   Short summer semester, lots of work and the pace was fast for 4 weeks.  Instructions were not quite clear initially but she did a good job answering questions and getting us on track. Group work was hard to get coordinated.  Overall good course and Dr. Alexander grades fairly.
                
                   Never graded an assignment until the last two weeks of the semester despite her promises to have grades done.  Helpful when asked, a bit disorganized, she had to rearrange the course calendar numerous times. Overall a good class and an easy A if you put in some effort.
                
                   This class was a nightmare. It was suppose to teach us beinging spreadsheets. I will be taking a cont. education class to teach me what I should have learned in this one.Grades not posted timely.Assigned over 30 spreadsheets & access assig., 3 10pg reports + more at last weeks of class. Assg. always changing at last min. on line class.
                
                   This was suppose to be beginner course for spreadsheets. The extra Solve It book did not explain well. It made alot of assumtions that the student knew things. The work load was always changing. 10 page reports APA style were due same weeks as major exams. Grades were not posted. Re We were assigned over 30 spreedsheets, 3 10pg reports + more.
                
                   She graded one assignment mid-way through the semester, was missing most of the rest of the time. I had no idea of my grade in the course, she assigned a major term paper 10 days before the end of the class but I got an A in the course so it worked out. Overall I'd say it was ok, but I was anxious most of the time about my final grade.
                
                   This professor does not grade on time. In my class, most people did not know what their grades were until grades were posted. She acted like she had alot of stuff going on therefore she paid little attention to the class and students.
                
                   She is a cool prof no exams assignment from the textbook easy A she might not answer you on time but who cares just do the assignment in the book and keep tryin to reach her even if she doesnt respond she will add that to your grade as A for effort but make sure you put in effort LOVE LOVE Her will take for all my MIS classes if possible
                
                   Follow instructions and do your assignments on time. Straight A but a lot of assignment to ensure you are following and hands on too...willing to help if you communicate with her
                
                   Follow instructions and do your assignments on time and you won't have problems. Yes there is lots of assignment which are very helpful. Just a way to ensure you are comprehending. Willing to help if you are willing to learn. Communicate with her if you have issues regarding deadlines and she is willing to help if your excuse is valid and reasonabl
                
                   Great course. Dr. Alexander took a genuine interest in student participation and made us think about the impact of tech. in the world. Lots of work but easy grading on papers. No quick turn around but I didn't care about that. Took online during summer. Enjoyed it and would recommend.
                
                   Laziest professor ever seen.It was a online class, and she did not grade any work all through the semester, and I had no idea what grade I will be receiving. After receiving my grade, I emailed trying to prove my work, and she just stopped responding to my emails. (not a professional attitude)
                
                   Too much work, and too lazy to grade work. Avoid if possible.
                
                   Very little interaction with prof and other students. Pretty self-paced. Only one exam, 2 cases, and group project. Prepare for and work ahead of group project well in advance of deadline. 
                
                   At first, I was very skeptical about the professor because his class wasn't filled up as quickly as others were and the review I read about him weren't so good. I also didn't  like being compelled to buy textbooks. I am glad I took his class. If you need A, buy his book, practice. It is now my manual for any tough statistical questions I may face.
                
                   Unfortunately with this class, there are very limited options with choice of professor. Class is very intense. He assigns two tests which are worth a big chunk of your grade. They take up the entire weekend, so don't plan anything. The price of his "book" keeps going up. I bought mine for almost $200 with shipping and tax. Lectures are very long
                
                   Worst on-line experience I've had in my entire academic career. Start with a heavy accent,  add unending incessant rambling and perpetual senseless pratter. Pre-heat the laptop. Blend the ingredients and simmer for several hours while attempting to remain awake and focused. Garnish with crushed caffeine. Need help?  Try a different recipe and chef.
                
                   Professor Arize is very clear about the length of the exams but if you follow his material, you will get and A. 
                
                   Absolutely Horrible.  His book, which he forces you to buy, is full of typos.  He uses different methods than everyone else, gives them different names.  His problems and assignments are ill conceived and full of errors, then he refuses to fix grades.  He makes you show all of your work on tests which takes absolutely forever even on easy problems.
                
                   Pre-recorded lectures are very good. The class notes are crucial to passing the class.  Additional stats book is not needed. Exams are take-home and take many hours, but they follow the class notes very closely. It's almost like being forced to work a bunch of homework and that's your exam. I learned more this way personally. Made an A. Good prof.
                
                   Tests are insane, 20 pages long, he gives you 3 days to do them but I'm sorry I dont have the time.
                
                   I read all the horrible reviews so I was concerned.  Statistics is also a challenge for me so I was really concerned.  However, do the assigned problems, thoroughly read the book and attend all lectures and you can get an A like I did.  It's a graduate level class, its supposed to be challenging.
                
                   This professor has 0 communication with his students. He has "assistants" running the class. They send the emails for him and post grades. He does not teach at all. You are forced to purchase his book. If you don't, you fail the exams because he uses questions from his book on the exam.
                
                   Absolutely the worst professor I've ever had. He forces you to purchase his "book" by putting questions from it on the test. No contact. No teaching. He uses known methods, but renames them and calls them his own (see Q-Method). No wonder the other professor's course filled up so quickly. DO NOT CHOOSE THIS PROFESSOR!!
                
                   Terrible... This professor was no help, if you email him he rarely got back to you.  The lectures were pointless, just bragging about himself and the book he wrote.  Overall worst prof I've had at this school and graduating next month.  AVOID HIM!
                
                   I took this class during the 2nd summer session.  It wasn't too hard, but the professor was horrible - the worst professor I have had so far.  He was not helpful at all and barely did any teaching.  The class live sessions were pointless and inconsistent, as well as the class notebook he had us buy.  If you can help it, please avoid his class!
                
                   This course demands that the student be very involved with the book put out by the instructor. If you do that, you will get a good grade. The only disagreement I have is that he will NOT return prior tests, papers so that you can learn by your mistakes. He did make the comprehensive to only cover the last five chapters so that was very helpful!
                
                   DO NOT TAKE HIS CLASS!!! I can't believe there are any positive remarks on here. You'll have to pay $130 for a 'textbook' he wrote, which is just a ream of copy paper littered with typos and inconsistencies. Plan to spend at least 12 hours on each of the exams and know that you won't see what you missed on the test. Absolutely terrible!!!!
                
                   Not worth it! You must teach yourself. Exam take an ENTIRE weekend to complete -- leaves no time for family or other classes. Project is given with no notice and given 3 days to complete.
                
                   I read most of the 150+ posts on this prof.  Clearly the positives where written by his GAs.  RUN FAR AWAY from this professor.  Worst class experience ever!
                
                   Worst instructor ever.  Incomprehensible style, irrelevant work.  Be prepared to spend HOURS hand writing formulas.  Excel is NOT permitted for most of the class.  Terrible.
                
                   Worst instructor and class I have experienced.  Simply terrible.  The book is full of spelling format and grammar errors.  The class is run by Grad Students who are still learning English.  Terrible.
                
                   Very difficult, very time consuming, stressful. With that said, get a jump on the class and you can get an A. Gives extra credit and uses his own book, even to the point where some of the exam answers are directly from the book. However, take a break and you may never catch up. This was an online course! Very Difficult!!!!! Uses his own book
                
                   A very difficult class, got off to a slow start (my fault).  Got a C on the mid-term.  The final was very difficult and the formulas were different then what was in the book. He had two live classes that were difficult to understand and wondered al over the place. This is not a class to take during the summer perhaps over a longer it would be bette
                
                   I just completed this class in an 8 week session as a pre-requisite for my MBA. This was my first graduate class. It was a little intimidating at first but with the use of lectures, powerpoints, and the textbook I was able to get an A. Lectures were designed for old version of textbook, which made it hard to follow at times. Recommend overall.
                
                   Touch course, lots of work and practice but if you do the work and exercises you can get a good grade. Professor is great and is helpful with any questions. Lots of quizzes or homework. You can get through this class if you stay on track.
                
                   Lot of work for an 8-week class.
                
                   I took 8-week class and found very interesting class.  I follow what Dr. Bandy suggested and I got an A. I read the book and did the odd problems (the answer is from the back of the book.
                
                   This professor may be a fair grader but he was very poor at relaying the subject matter. The coursework was overkill with 4 quizzes due every week. The benefit is you may rework quizzes till you get the grade you desire however you may not learn much. No interaction at all with students in the online class.
                
                   Dr. Bandy has prerecorded lectures that do assist in learning statistics. The course started off understandable enough, but I found taking it over 8 weeks to be very challenging once the more complicated topics were introduced. Dr. Bandy is a good professor, though. Expect to work really hard to get that A. Very fair class, but lots of work!
                
                   Let me tell you, this online class is A LOT of work. 2 quizzes each week, discussions each week and a final exam. You can't be lazy in this class. However, Prof. Bandy is very helpful and always takes the time to respond to any questions or concerns.
                
                   real good professor, helpfull. easy quizzes and exams. give options and multi attemps to improve the grades
                
                   Took his class online. He gives a good deal of homework and that is the majority of your grade in the class. the work is difficult and long but you are allowed to work everything until its correct. I got an A, but it required lots of time. Grades very fair..
                
                   He is one of the best professors I've ever taken.  He is very responsive and very helpful.  The material is tough, but he is very fair in grading and is very clear on what is expected. I made an A!
                
                   great teacher
                
                   I took his online course and enjoyed it. He was responsive to emails.
                
                   Very fair professor - tough class.  His curriculum was well thought out, and he was very responsive to students.
                
                   I took the online course and never met him. Dr. Bandy is a little sporadic at times with the work he assigns, and he prefers to communicate through email rather than on the course website. However, he's  very understanding, genuinely cares, and doesn't make you feel stupid when you ask idiotic questions. Two thumbs up!
                
                   Excellent.   Accessible and challenging as an instructor.  Did not rubber stamp assignments, and pointed out text typos etc in a timely fashion.
                
                   This was a online class. Never went to the college or met him. He started out and overwhelmed us. I almost dropped the class. Then I realized that he will work with you and help you SO MUCH. He is VERY understanding and a good professor to take. He just requires a lot of work out of you!
                
                   Pretty boring but his class was pretty easy. I made a B but when I averaged my total points, I had over the amount of points that were required to make a 100, because of bonuses. Not sure how it happened, but waited too long to get it fixed.
                
                   Bandy assigns lots of work ...lots but it is easy work.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Took this course online and it was by far the easiest class I've taken as an MBA student. You have 2 to 4 quizzes due per week. Each quiz is 10-15 questions & you basically have 3 quizzes for you final exam. If you need to take this course I highly reccommend this professor.
                
                   This is an easy class.  Prof Bandy doesn't really interact much with the students. Expect that any questions you ask on the chat boards will be answered by your fellow students before Prof Bandy gets around to it.  His lectures are prerecorded and the page and slide numbers he references no longer correspond to the new materials for the course.
                
                   Makes you work hard if you want to make an A. I liked this class by him, because it is not impossible to make a good grade. If you want it you need to work for it. 
                
                   He basically doesn't care.  He changed assignment instructions after I turned it in, then gave me a 65 on my paper.  The dean will take his side too.  I took the final but he decided not to grade it & told the dean I didn't pass.  He is questionable at best.  DO NOT TAKE HIS CLASS!!!!
                
                   This teacher is an idiot. This class is a computer sciense class and he has head stuck up Bill Gates but.  This is a discussion class and he threatend me when I said anything that was not PRO Microsoft.
                
                   Very helpful teacher..classes are a little boring but just ask for help he will tell you everything..and he is funny as well
                
                   He Is Awesome
                
                   He has been by far the best professor I have had due letting work on my own.
                
                   YAH YAH YAH . . . classes are doable and manageable. Have to study for tests but professor is very fair & knowledgable.
                
                   This man should retire but his class is easy. When you need some help on a project he will get off topic and talk about his family, tell you about the sales in the paper. Nothing you hear in class goes on the exams.
                
                   Nice man. Lectures are quite boring. If you do all the daily assignments you don't have to worry to much about the exams.
                
                   good teacher
                
                   What the hell is up with this guy's voice&#63; It scares me everytime he talks. He lets you do your work though, and he will help you if you ask. He cares where youre at. But that voice, it sounds like a tornado alarm going off. He is a crazy old man.
                
                   We really don't do anything important. plan to teach yourself. He is not friendly.
                
                   Plan on learning the topics on your own.  Information provided in class is not in preparation for exams.
                
                   Grades very harsh on assignments.  Didn't think the assignments were difficult or tricky, but I received a C on most of them which plummeted my grade.  I ended up with a high B, but usually receive A's in my classes.  Not pleased.  Brought down my entire GPA.
                
                   She give ridiculous assignments that are almost impossible to find and grades way to harsh.  She will give an example of how to format something and then count off in places where you followed the format EXACTLY!!!  Completely ridiculous!!! I would not recommended taking her class unless you want to get things counted wrong when you followed direct
                
                   -No timely grading, Heavy work load
                
                   Exam are very tough 
                
                   Only 2 tests - mid-term and Final.  2 major papers.  Stickler about APA-style.  Will take off significantly if you do not format papers strictly by APA.  Other than that, you will have no problem making a high grade.  Very responsive in emails.  More or less self-taught.  You will need to read the textbook chapters required for the exams.  
                
                   Great professor!  This class is not the best, but Dr. English makes it entertaining.
                
                   Do exactly what he says and follow the APA format to the tee and u will get an A.
                
                   I follow his guidelines and did great on my research paper.  Make sure you do as he asked on the paper, you will be fine. He requires less essay to write than other professors; but he does make sure that you have a good understanding of the research approachs and materials.
                
                   Good course and easy workload for the summer.  Test were straightforward and papers were graded leniently.
                
                   Good course to take over the summer online.  Not a ton of work, but still learned the material.
                
                   Very good class to take in your first semester of the MBA program. It is very time intensive, but he does everything he can to keep you on top of your work. Make sure to write all papers according to APA format and you will be fine. Two multiple choice question test aren't too bad, use the powerpoints provided and study definitions.
                
                   I took him for a Business Research class during my graduate degree. I thought he was a good prof. The class is fairly easy, two papers and two tests. He goes over everything on the test in class and the papers are pretty easy as long as you know APA. He doesn't mess around about the APA format. I would def. recommend him.
                
                   He is OK, but not the best at all. He tries so hard to make the subject hard! He is not generous in markes at all so A is hard to get.
                
                   Dr. E is a nice professor. His teaching makes a research class easier to understand. He reviews the text before exam, memorize the reviewed text and class notes, and you'll be fine for exams. The research paper is the hardest part, prepare earlier and don't be shy to ask him any questions should help you get through it.
                
                   Online summer class. Great Prof! Study, do your work and you will get your A. 2 MC 100 question exams. 2 Papers, Discussions.
                
                   BEST BA prof here! Online summer2 2009 course-very fast paced, but able to keep up with weekly readings, discussion postings and successfully write 2 papers (lit review & full research paper) on topic of my choosing. Research, write and cite well, and you will succeed. Take this course first grad semester as very relevant for future research docs.
                
                   Thought course would be killer with long papers, but wasn't. Basically 2 version of the same paper. You have freedom to pick research topic. He inspired me to learn a new skill and now I'm interested in Business research as a career! Study the book chapters verbatim but not too difficult exams. Got an A and didn't expect it.
                
                   Very fast paced for a summer class: 2 tests, 2 papers, 2 chapters/week of discussion board questions to post/respond to. High volume, but not difficult, per se.  Just keep up at all times. Triple check your papers for proper APA style.
                
                   Dr. English was wonderful!  Very personable, responsive to e-mails.  The workload was very attainable for the summer session.  Wish I could take him for another class.
                
                   Very Good professor for all, yet still a bit under-challenging. I would have liked more projects, but it was a 4 week course. Also, technology (i.e. slide projector) was out of date, but the message still came across. I would have liked to see more modern uses of business research in practice.
                
                   Not difficult if you have a brain. Put in some effort, get your A, and move on.  Nice guy teaching a rather dull subject.  Always willing to help.  Follow his guidelines and you'll be fine.
                
                   Wonderful teacher. Paper intensive (you will get sick of being stuck at your keyboard), but not unrealistic. Dr. Engish is a nice prof, a funny guy, but he is dead serious about his standards and they are high.
                
                   Took for research methods. Stickler for plagerism.  Very fair.
                
                   I took this class online and Ms. Foster knows statistics. The workload was light with on homework assignment per week, a mid-term, and the final. She responds quickly to questions and will make sure you understand. Be sure to ask questions. I found this course a little tough online, but she will guide you through it. Highly recommended!
                
                   Great professor! love her got an A. I definitely recommend her.
                
                   Straight-forward instructor. You will learn to write a graduate-level paper.
                
                   Dr. Flanagan is an easy grader but you have to do the work.  Approach this online MBA class with a professional attitude and a positive work ethic and you will ace it.  Good communication via weekly emails.  You MUST complete the online discussions for each module.  This is instead of live class lectures. Easy intro class.
                
                   Short: Expect 2 major papers to write. Long: She is awesome, gives plenty of time on assignments. There are no "weekly" assignments. All assignments become available at the start of the semester, so you can knock them out quickly, but they aren't due for weeks (even between assignments). Also she is quite beautiful.
                
                   The first time, I took this course with another professor, it was terrible.  This professor did a great job, I got  an A, i was shocked her exam was simple and easier to understand and take.  Take her!!!!
                
                   Hello,  The syllables was clear and to the point. Quiz grade is weighted a little more than the Exam Tests. The instructor encourage you to e-mail her if you have questions and schedule Live Chats during the week to discuss questions with classmates. Complete the homework, discussion boards, and pass the quizzes and the exams. You will pass.
                
                   Very easy professor.  Allows you to turn in essays multiple times for revision and turn in early for extra credit.  Class was short and sweet and very simple.  I received an A while working full time and taking another class in the summer.  I highly recommend.
                
                   Dr. Flangan was a wonderful teacher! She is very quick to respond and will answer any question you have.  Even though the two papers can seem daunting, she is mainly looking for APA citation and is definitely a fair grader.  I would highly recommend her for this course.  She was also lovely to interact with via email.
                
                   Dr Flanagan is the best proffesor that I ever had. She wans you to learn and give you credit. Easy class if you have the basic writing skills. The class was easy and the twonexams that i have taken were easy ti. Dr Flanagan gives you from 4 to 7 hours to do the exam which is enugh time to submit the best answer. Dr Floanagan is the best option.
                
                   EASY! If you are good at writing it will be a breeze. I just got done with a 15 hour semester and her course was the easiest I had. She is also a fair grader (probably even more so than that). Also, trust me you will love the amount of time that you'll have to complete assignments. EASY! EASY! EASY! Plus she's down to earth and just great. TAKE HER
                
                   Easy class if you have any writing background. Dr. Flanagan is excellent with communication. Easy grader, but this is supposed to be an intro to business writing class and she understands that. She encourages you throughout the class, give excellent feedback. I'd highly recommend.
                
                   Easy class if you do the work. There are some time consuming papers, but Prof. Flanagan is a very generous grader. This class was too soft for a MBA level course.
                
                   Dr. Flanagan is very nice and the course is easy to do well in. There is quite a bit of work to do which makes the course more time consuming than difficult. Well structured class, and I am very glad I chose this professor.
                
                   Most helpful teacher. Very responsive and lenient. Must take!
                
                   Dr. Flanagan was awesome! Incredily clear when explaining the material and the HW and exams were very easy. Her main goal is making sure her students understand the material, not making the class difficult or confusing. There's nothing hard about this class. Just show up and do your HW and discussions and this class will be an easy A.
                
                   This is the easiest class ever. I got a perfect score! So long as you do your assignments and turn them in on time you should be fine.
                
                   Easy, interesting class that will actually be useful in the work force, imagine that!
                
                   I loved this Professor! I have taken her for three courses and got A's in all her classes. She is a great professor, very helpful and caring. Didn't use book for two of the classes except BA 302 due to it being an online stats class(took STATS with her the second time around and got an A). Great professor. Definitely recommend!
                
                   I was on my last time to take Stats and she really helped me this time.  I actually understand it.
                
                   She is a wonderful professor who makes very hard topics look very easy. I had so much fun learnig statistics. We had three test each home and in class and some homework. Lots of questions, but we were given perfect reviews. She is the one to take for all business classes!!!
                
                   Dr. Folden was a breath of fresh air.  His lectures are pre-recorded and correspond to power points.  He assigns quizzes through McGraw hill and they are a necessary component to doing well on exam.  I believe we had 5 exams including the final.  All in all - very informative, very organized, very articulate teacher.  
                
                   He is an extremely fair teacher. I have just enrolled in 2 more of his classes.
                
                   I really enjoyed this professor. I didn't seek much help throughout this course as I felt it was pretty straight forward. There were three essays and four projects, but none were very difficult to complete. I would recommend this professor and this course to others.
                
                   Fair class - more of a self-taught class.  He didn't really teach much, but the due dates on the assignments were flexible.  As long as you keep up with the work and do a thorough job on the assignments and discussions, you'll do well.
                
                   Was not helpful at all during the course.  Didn't give any guidance during the online course as it was simply "log online and do it yourself".  Extremely strict on the final paper with no flexibility or guidance on how to do it better.  If you mess up one project, the rest of your grade goes down the drain.
                
                   Assistant Professor Folden was very hands-off in an online course that should have more attention given to it. Purchasing the text is a waste of money as he prohibits you from referencing it in all work. His grading is very critical and he got so annoyed by students asking for clarification that he threatened to modify due dates.
                
                   VERY WONDERFUL PROFESSOR! Sometimes you need a break and this professor gives you one. The stress can eat you alive and his class gives you a moment to breathe and not lose your sanity. Lots of writing, but professor is great~I cry thinking i only take this class once!
                
                   Lots of written work and essays as well as a research paper.  If you keep up with assignments and good time manager, there is no problem doing well.
                
                   Fair class with a lot of busy work.  If you follow the APA guidelines and prof instructions, all will be fine. Professor grades with flexibility and is solid. Interesting subject matters.
                
                   This is a self guided class which is totally doable if you stay on top of things. Dr. Folden is very quick to respond to emails and give good overall directions. The work is not hard but there is a lot of it so you need to stay on track. I would probably recommend this professor to someone who needs to take BA595 for sure.
                
                   The absolute worst professor I have ever had! Got a good grade but learned nothing. He did not teach anything and provided no help at all. He is an assistant prof for a reason and he has legitimately made me call into question the validity of this MBA program!
                
                   This was a great online class that had a steady workload and clear exams and papers. As long as you keep up with the discussions and write a supported research paper you will get an A in this class. The professor was great!
                
                   Online BA 595: Can't fail the class unless you want to! The professor allows for flextime to accomdates students lifestyle and other class workload.He also provides PRECISE examples of each assignment.  It's a heavy workload but extremely reasonable.  I highly recommend him!! He answers questions promptly.
                
                   Great prof! I took his online class for BA 595. He pretty much spells out the work that you need to do. You cannot go wrong with him. Follow the syllabu to a T and you'll be fine. You would have to be a complete moron to fail his class. I recommend him taking him and would take him again in a second.
                
                   This class is horrible. He gives you a syllabus, a book list, and sets you on your way. I'm took it online and there is little to no feedback.
                
                   I shouldn't have been so worried before I started this class. The professor was a bit ambiguous when I tried to ask for some input on my decision of a research topic. To help, I used a Firefox plugin called ZOTERO & it saved my life.  It's a citation manager that catalogs & helps to cite perfectly in a word processor -creating a bibliography with it is EASY
                
                   Time consuming course that requires you to learn APA formatting.  I took this course too late in my MBA course cirriculumn and would have benefited by taking it at the beginning of my experience.
                
                   I had this class for summer I; very intense.  Everything is laid out for you and he responds to questions most of the time the same day.  Not sure if I would recommend taking this class during the summer if you have a full time job.
                
                   Easy class if you can follow directions and write a sentence.  The paper takes some time and as a summer class was intense trying to get everything done.  I had everything done in 4 weeks and had nothing to do going into the fifth and final week.  He was very helpful and responsive.
                
                   Dr. Folden lays the class out for you in the syllabus. If you follow his lead, you will do fine. The course is very labor intensive. Not recommended for summer sessions but is very doable. Would recommend.
                
                   The course name Economic Research is a bit deceiving.  It is really 99% about learning to write a paper using APA formatting.  You must be committed to that from day 1 as you will get critiqued on a topic approval form the first two weeks, and then you will do the APA assignment and discussion. Beware the ranting emails to the entire class!
                
                   Focus on correct APA formatting and cite facts, not your opinions, or YOU WILL FAIL. Revolves around building one research paper. It follows a topic  literature review  final paper format. Rubrics and outlines are provided for each step of the process.  You must the read book for exams. If you want learn to do quality research, take this class.
                
                   She required an assignment to be turned into the writing lab 5 days prior to submitting it for a grade. Which is possible except she did not deny my topic until the tuesday before the next assignment was due. Which gave me exactly 5 days till it was due. By the time I got a new topic approved I had no time to send to the writing center. Had to drop
                
                   Dr. Gibson is helpful if you put in the work.  Gives genourous extra credit.  However, the research paper assignments are not easy so if you are looking for an easy class, this class is not for you. Extremely tough grader, especially when it comes to not following APA guidelines. Exams are semi-tough but if you read the book you can get an A.
                
                   This class was a little hard, but nothing that can't be done with some taught. Great class. Do the discussions and quiz weekly, one paper (case brief) and you will pass. Test are 100 multi choice, but isn't that hard. Just study.
                
                   The toughest part about Dr. Garrett's class was the exams. They were over 100 multiple choice questions, but he gives you 2 and a half hours to do them. He gives good lectures, but he basically teaches straight from the powerpoints. I missed class a lot, and I still made a high A. You can definitely take this class online and still do just as well.
                
                   Professor Garrett's class isn't a blow off one. You have to do the work to get the grade you want. There are discussions and a quiz over each chapter. It was tough at first but then it got easier. Do the quizzes because some of the quiz answers are on the exams. You get what you work for in this class. He is responsive to emails which is a plus.
                
                   I would say avoid Garrett at all costs, but as he is the ONLY person teaching this class, my advice is to not expect any help from him.  He will send out regular emails saying things like "You are not ready for a case brief because you don't know how to write one."  Although he never explains it anyways.  Doesn't get evolved in the discussions. RUN
                
                   Teacher is fine. Not hard work just reading, discussions, and quiz every week. It takes a couple of weeks to get use to but it gets easier through the semester. Just do your assignments on time and you will do great.
                
                   Mr. Garrett's business law class was interesting and quite easy if you apply yourself to the work that is given by him.  I took this class online and really learned a lot.  Mr. Garret will help in anyway possible.  He answers your emails in a timely sometimes quick fashion.  Take the class and you can easily earn a B, just like I did.
                
                   Mr. Garrett is an awesome professor! I took this class online and it was challenging, but Mr. Garrett is extremely knowledgable in the subject and will guide you through it. Read the text, do well on the quizzes and the tests will not be so bad. I got an A! Just put in the effort and you'll be fine! Take Mr. Garrett for law! You won't regret it!
                
                   I don't think he tries to make things tricky, that is just the nature of business law. Communicative and receptive.
                
                   This class will be a challenge for any student. It is a lot of information to take in and this professor wants you to take it all in!! you will learn something if you want to or not. Plan to read the chapters in full and to still miss questions on the test. I will pull off a B but it has taken a lot of time and hard work!!
                
                   Class is extremely hard, but you will learn plenty. His questions on tests and quizzes are tricky. I think he is the only one teaching business law... so good luck.
                
                   This class is very hard online. The tests and quizzes have trick questions that make them hard to understand, so there is no point in studying. If you can choose another teacher, save yourself. I made an A in all four of my other classes, but barely made a B in this one. Oh and good luck hearing back from him when you email him.
                
                   Dr. Garrett is one of the smartest people and one of the greates professors I have ever had. You need the book but you will be using it all the time since his online quizes come from the publisher. If you take the quizes and do well, the exams will not be too hard. They are long though, over 100 questions per a test.
                
                   Professor Garrett is absolutely a wonderful professor. After having my personal experiences of taking many online courses, I was skeptical of the quality I might receive from TAMU- Commerce, in particular this class. But the experience with Professor Garrett has made me believe that experiencing a high quality learning experience is entirely possib
                
                   The class was pretty interesting, everthing is done online and he does give some tricky questions, the test are incredibly long
                
                   The quizzes/test seem to have many trick questions on them. The class however was interesting.
                
                   This is a tough class, you have to teach yourself because it is online. However, he provides videos, power points, and sample exams to prepare you for the exams. Four exams, four total grades in the class. He provides extra credit for every exam. He pays close attention to usage logs and how often you log on, so don't ask for help if you don'tstudy
                
                   If you are the type of student that can teach yourself then this is the class for you, if not I would look for another professor. The only grades are 4 exams. He posts a lecture but there is no HW. You are expected to work the problems from the book on your own. He did give us extra credit on every exam though. 
                
                   She was very fair and quick to grade and respond to questions.  she does require class participation.  I enjoyed her class.
                
                   This was an easy A class that I blew it on. There are 8 modules and I forgot to turn on in. I ended with an 88 rather than a high A. She has a no mercy on late work policy that is clearly stated in syllabus. It was my own stupid fault. Good teacher. Easy class. Just turn your work in on time and you're ok.
                
                   Very easy instructor. If you don't get an A in her class you probably forgot to turn something in. She is laid back and grades pretty quickly.
                
                   She is very clear, concise, and helpful. I look forward to having her as an instructor again.
                
                   Excellent instructor. Communication is easy, clear, concise and confirms information in the syllabus. Enjoyable class that follows current issues.
                
                   Took this online class as part of the mandatory courses for the major.  Prof Lair is very helpful. The syllabus is laid out early and makes meeting deadlines easy. She responds to emails quickly. You will enjoy the coursework too.
                
                   Online Class.  Very clear on expectations.  Discussions, Quizes, and a couple assignments and papers.  Just follow the directions and you'll get an A.
                
                   Great elective and very nice prof. Highly recommended for online miniterms; not overwhelming at all.
                
                   Great teacher. Very helpful.
                
                   Very simple Practicum. Have a few class discussions, journals, quizzes, and reading assignments. Have 1 book summary and 1 personal goals paper to write. The book summary is on a book with about 60 pages. Class is simple and teacher is very helpful and easy. Just do the work and you should be fine.
                
                   Great teacher!! Former engineer for NASA. Enough said.
                
                   A+ professor, just make sure that you attend class because he gives you all the information you need to succeed. Also, do the reviews because the tests are VERY similiar.
                
                   I highly recommend.  Dr. Manton is an easy grader and curves at the end of the semester.  He communicates well and responds quickly.  You can resubmit homework assignments for higher grades and he will usually give you full credit if you resubmit and communicate with him.
                
                   Dr. Manton makes Stats as painless as possible. He is available to answer questions and will work with students who have a demanding schedule. Students should be sure to read the text, do the problems/homework, and ask for help, if needed and things will be OK.
                
                   Great professor!  He explains well, gives good exam review and is willing to work with you. Very knowledgable!!
                
                   This professor is great! He's helpful and is quick to help you understand any part of the subject you have difficulty with. I took this class during the Summer, so it was challenging to fit in such a vast amount of work, but the professor sets up due dates in a fashion that keeps you from falling behind. I would recommend this professor and course.
                
                   Very good professor. Knows how to teach the course in to all levels of students. Made the course interesting by referring methods to real life business challenges. I enyoyed his methods and processes to teach the course. I also likes how he went the extra mile to help. Dr. Manton ia fair and very practical. Take good notes and attend all sessions.
                
                   Hard subject, excellent teacher! Above all helpful and fair.
                
                   Excellent teacher, took the Summer class, tough to fit in but very helpful. Exams straight forward. Highly recommend this professor.
                
                   He is a great teacher. Works problems right from the book and gives you the anwsers to them to look back at. It is math so you have to attend class or you will get behind. Just so up and do the problems given and you can make a good grade. Choose him for statistics.
                
                   I took this class at UCD and was very impressed with the quality of instruction, helpfulness of the professor, and ease of this class. Take good notes, he gives a very comprehensive study guide prior to exams and does curve a little bit. Homework can be time intensive, but it helps keep you on track when exams roll around.
                
                   Attentive, patient, and amazingly helpful for an online prof. Lets you resubmit hw and will walk you through the steps several times without getting irritated. One of the best teachers I've ever had! Only negative is that everyone must take exams on specified dates at specified times, which can be difficult if you work. Highly recommended!
                
                   Excellent teacher.  Just show up to class and take thorough notes and you will be fine!  When I took my undergrad stat class, I cried daily because it was so hard.  For my Master's level I took Manton, and he made it seem SO easy!  Highly recommend!
                
                   don't think twice, Take this class with him.. Do what he ask you to do .. and you gonna take A ... Attendance are important for you to understand the subject so easily. 10 easy HW, 2 easy exams .... Good Luck
                
                   He is the best, don't think twice, I wish to have another class with him.
                
                   I took Dr. Manton's undergrad stats class and learned so much. He's a great professor just make sure you attend all classes, take notes and do the homework. He goes over exactly what you need for the tests and allows a formula sheet for tests. Easy A if you put forth the effort.
                
                   Dr. Manton is a GREAT professor, provides many practice questions in class and for assignments, that's definitely good for a statistic class. His teaching is clear and willing to answer questions. Review questions are given before exams, make sure you know how to do, then you will be fine. Sit front row bcoz he doesn't speak loudly.
                
                   Easy class. I would recommend this class with this professor to every one! Just study your note and your homework and you will be fine.
                
                   Forget about teaching, the first thing in a person should be that they are good from inside and Dr. Manton is one of the best good hearted person I have met in my entire life. I remember him from more then 14 years ago. He is extremely honest, extremely fair. He is good teacher, tests are hard but if you study you will make an A. I did.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   he should know how bad he is.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very knowledgeable and helpful profressor. She takes you step by step thru the course to write a big research paper. Learned alot in her class.
                
                   A good introduction to academic research. Prof McElhany is a helpful teacher who is deeply concerned with her student's success in the course.  My only concern was the lack of a weekly lecture option to reinforce concepts presented in reading materials.
                
                   Super helpful teacher. Class was basically about writing one long paper. She gives your examples and sets you on a path to be successful with the project. Peer revuiews were required and helped a lot with the paper. Overall really easy and informative class. Would definitely recommend.
                
                   Professor Bussell is one of the most engaging online professors I have taken so far at TAMUC.  This is an elective for me, but I would jump at the chance to take another class.  She engages with weekly activities that involve practicing what you covered that week.  I would suggest taking her class if you have felt a disconnect taking online classes
                
                   Easy in difficulty. Reviews questions ahead of time. One paper that is 1 page. Pop quizes over cases.
                
                   Professor Resendez is a very inspirational and involved professor in regards to leading an online class.  You will learn a lot if you are engaged, but I warn there is writing and two 5+ pages projects.  This was a busy class for a summer session, but she will help and responds to email in a timely manner.  Do all the assignments and test essays.
                
                   This professor is one of those rare to find amazing professors. She is super kind and responds to emails quickly. If she teaches any of the other classes I need; I will be picking her as my professor!! Test Reviews are given and feedback on assignments is highly amazing! I have never had any other professor take the time and give feedback like her.
                
                   This instructor gives out reviews for exams. They are more like topics that you will find on the exams and you have to look for the answers in the book. Assignments are easy to follow and you have to show up for class to hear about due dates.  
                
                   The best professor ever, she will help you no matter what as long as you call her or email her ahead of time, the tests are hard but not as hard when you study, all of the test questions is in the book so the book is required. Over all the best ever! everyone must take her class! she is also very funny.
                
                   Not recommended taking as a summer class, excessive written assignments each week in addition to the discussions, a journal project and research paper due throughout. Most weighted is the tests which are open for one day. Assignments critically graded with feed back -opportunity on selected assignments to rework to recommendations and resubmit
                
                   EXCELLENT professor! She gave a lot of work, all of which was relevant to the exam and plenty of opportunity to make a good grade. She always gave feedback and was quick to grade work and respond to e-mails. She seemed to actually care about the student. 4 exams(20%), 1 journal research paper(5%), 1 research paper(10%), lots of assignments (.29%)
                
                   She is one of the most passionate professors I have ever taken. She made everyday fun, and was very very knowledgeable about the information all the way through! You will miss out if you don't take her.
                
                   Ms. Resendez is awesome! Very passionate about the subject and wants students to succeed! Four exams, 1 term paper, 1 journal project, and handful of easy assignments. I loved this class! I highly recommend Ms. Resendez as a professor!
                
                   Great Professor! Very helpful and understanding! Would take her again. Do your work and you will pass!
                
                   This was a pretty easy class. Discussion board, quizzes, and writing assignments were all very easy. The exams were straight from the book. Ms. Robertson was always available to answer questions. Just keep up with the assignments, and you'll get an A!
                
                   This is an online class and she teaches as if you have nothing else to do in your life. I know many others who are taking different sections of the same class (online and on campus) and none of them have even half the workload of Kristi's. I have had to cut corners (not reading the chapter)in order to do all the other work that she assigns.
                
                   Krisit is an excellent professor. She is extremely helpful and shows that she cares about her students.
                
                   I really don't like this professor! What's the purpose of having an online course when she assigns TEAM PROJECTS!!! My schedule doesn't allow for these stupid projects for Pete's Sake this course is online.
                
                   Took the online class.  Very organized...do the work and stay on schedule, no problems.
                
                   She is a good teacher. Advice:Know how to type before you go in to this class. Otherwise you will fall behind when doing projects in class. But she is good at catching you up. You will do some of your projects in class which is nice, so you do not have to do them at home. She's very helpfull. Work load is pretty easy. I love the class.
                
                   I agree the comments about needing to retire.  She is does NOT know what she is teaching.  I can read the book just as well as she can - so why do I need her&#63;
                
                   Great teacher!  The textbook information was presented to us with open-book online quizes.  Class time was spent on practical application in the form of a group project.  This was a great set up for a summer course.  Very enjoyable class.
                
                   Sometimes unorganized - great info for a capstone course. Tests are tricky, as words are twisted around. Listen to exactly HOW she wants the assignments done or you will lose points & that will effect final grade. Good professor.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   As a non business major I found her to challenging but the business students thought that she should retire as she isn't trained to teach what she is teaching.  I disagree.
                
                   I had her for an online class. The assignments were fine and not to hard. But the tests were hard because they didn't not make sense (had mispelled words, repeated questions, etc.). I think a GA must make up the test and they don't do a very good job.
                
                   she is a great instructor and really cares about her students in and out of the classroom
                
                   She works you hard but you get the grade you earn.  SHe has knowledge of business.  Her stories are interesting
                
                   I completed two of her classes, Business Communication and a Capstone course,  Strategy of Decision Making.  She was through and fair with her grading system.  We had to work hard but it was worth it!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Yes, she is nearing retirement
                
                   Nearing retirement
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This professor has a full time job away from Commerce that is his top priority.  He travels often, and does not respond in a timely manner.  Has been known to miss Class Live over conflicts with his first job.  Tests are straight from the book, with short essays.  The exam reviews prepare students well.  He is informal with students.
                
                   I think I went to class a total of 5 times, he never stays on topic and always looks distraught. All of his online exams and quizzes are on quizlet, but the projects can be confusing if you don't go to class the first couple of times or if you can't find someone to pay to do them for you. 
                
                   One of my favorite professors! Very funny and he was easy. I recommend taking him, it was genuinely one of the easiest A's I got.
                
                   He is an amazing teacher! You have several projects/test, however if you read the material and do the work you cannot go wrong. He is extremely fair. I will take every class he offers that I need.
                
                   Very nice and so helpful! I plan to take every class I can with Dr. St. John.  I asked him for career advice and he gave me such good information! He genuinely cares about his students.
                
                   The course work was not extremely difficult, but could be a little challenging if you have little or no knowledge of databases. Discussion boards, assignments, and quizzes were required. Professor responded to questions and some discussion, but not too much interaction. Take the class and follow directions; you'll be fine.
                
                   Great class.  Instructor replied to emails OK and was interested in me doing good.  Will take again!
                
                   This class was easier than I thought it would be.  My only complaint was that the professor took too long to return graded work.  Otherwise, this was a fairly decent class.
                
                   Professor is very slow to respond to emails.  Grades seemed to be arbitrarily assigned to 5 projects.  Quizzes were easy and straight from text.  Discussion boards were required, easy points but no interaction by professor.  Even though entire class is online and professor does no communication, the weekly units do not open until the week listed.
                
                   I was dreading this class this semester but it turned out to be my favorite class.  Dr. St. John is very helpful and I actually received constructive criticism which will help me in other classes.  I will definitely be taking more of his classes.
                
                   Great prof!
                
                   Dr. St. John is a very helpful professor. Responds to emails quickly and will help with any questions. I took this class online this summer, and it was pretty easy. Five discussions, 4 projects, and 2 exams. I recommend him for this class!
                
                   Helpful if you ask for help.  He stays out of discussions but he is willing to work with you.
                
                   I felt like the course was easy, but the professor rarely responded to emails.  There were 10 weekly quizzes that were easy points;  Discussion questions that the professor did not participate in, whatsoever; 3 papers--the last paper was an actual research paper, but was extremely easy in my opinion and I'm one who typically HATES research papers.
                
                   Nice guy, online class so it's kind of hard to rate his personality really.  The class is pretty easy, just do the work and you'll do just fine!  Assignments are appropriate for the class type.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She is very knowledgeable and she is always is asking questions in the online sessions, so they are very interactive.
                
                   Easy A just requires work nothing challenging
                
                   Dr. Walker is sort of hands off with this course, but gives clear instruction that is easy to follow. If you complete the work without procrastination, you should be fine. She is responsive to questions. I recommend this professor.
                
                   Well organized class with relevant material and assignmnts for learning the research process. Dr. Walker provided timely feedback on assignments that were helpful. She also responded quickly to emails and questions posted in the class. Highly recommend.
                
                   Her material is outdated, she does not respond to emails and expects you to learn the material yourself. Not sure why you need a professor if you have to learn on your own. There are several other professors that teach this course, try taking them and steer clear of this professor.
                
                   participate on day one or two of the module assignment and you'll get full participation credit.  Learn APA format, found youtube videos helpful.  She does not teach the material you must learn it yourself.  Papers focus on APA, not really content. Exams multiple choice and fairly easy.
                
                   took online class. You got show you in it starting first day. But she will ease on it. Clear instructions You have to read each line she will read your paper and big on APA style always. she returns assigment right away, never gives perfet score for discussion questions she want you to think and respond to classmates. Select popular topic you be ok
                
                   In the thick of it in summer 2 online...have an a so far, she has ridiculous amt of ass. for amt of time, does not realize PEOPLE WORK to provide a living 4 their families...her syllabus is clear, but her expectations of 2 tests, 2 papers and a ton of posts is ridiculous, last summer I had 2 tests THAT WAS IT!!! She needs to get a clue or LEAVE..
                
                   She is not a bad professor, as the previous post said she is focused on the APA format and that's all she cares about. The tests are relatively easy and i think that overall its a nice class.
                
                   Took class online. She responds quickly to emails and is helpful. There's no real teaching, just read the PowerPoints/book and do the discussions. Paper is all about APA format. Tests are multiple choice and true/false.
                
                   willing to help if asked
                
                   The worst techer I have had in the Bus. Dept. She is so old and out of touch with the business world, she did not know any thing about international business. She went crazy in class and trested us like we where going to hurt her. She is to stupid to use the overhead right. My advise is not to go to class, read the book, show up and take the test.
                
                   She seriously needs to retire - or at least stop collecting a paycheck as she is already retired on the job.
                
                   I was surprised to have a business professor who was so unprofessional. Lost papers, boring teaching techniques, IF work was returned it would take forever, never really knew what was going on, thinks her way is the only way. Also freaked out in class, we thought she was going to have a breakdown!!
                
                   Can't stand her!!!! She comes in late and never lets students ask questions.  IF you have one she wants you to go to GA to get answers because she doesn't grade her own work.  IT is time for her to be let go or retire
                
                   worst professor I ever had. She never listens and even got mad in class and started acting crazy.  I would change majors than take her again
                
                   She needs to retire and move on. She makes no sense and her style of teaching is strange.  She is one of those that hang around because nothing to do.
                
                   Good professor ready to retire.
                
                   Isn't the best prof. in town but isn't the worst either.
                
                   Oh my, where would I start.  Fortunately she isn't tough.
                
                   Prof. Delatte is one the sweetest and best person I have gotten the pleasure to meet. I took both financial and managerial accounting with her and both were not easy by any means, but I learned accounting that's for sure. There is not nearly enough room in this review to say how fantastic Prof. Delatte is, because she is awesome.
                
                   Accounting is a hard subject but Prof. DeLatte will help you through it! Lectures can get dry but attending class is a must for your participation grade. There are online homeworks, two of which she drops. Two tests and a final. Make sure you really know everything before the tests! Don't be scared to ask for help, she is so nice and wants to help
                
                   She wants her students to pass and is always in a energetic happy mood for class. 
                
                   Was such a excellent helpful professor! Would definitely suggest taking him
                
                   Professor Elzweig is an amazing professor. He is very laid-back and knowledgeable about the material. He has a lot of experience to back up his examples. GO TO CLASS. Missing one class could cost you an example on the tests. Very willing to help you get an 'A' if you want to work for it! I left the class knowing and understanding more.
                
                   I took this course during Summer II and I liked it. Elzweig is very laid back.  Although, he doesn't take attendance I would recommend that you attend class becauase most of his questions on his tests are from his lectures. This class was challenging for me but if you attend class and study the notes that you take in class then it is do-able.
                
                   excellant professor, makes boring material engaging, tests are a little tricky but making an A is no problem
                
                   He is a great teacher, he explains things clear and the test are very doable if you go to class.
                
                   Really enjoyed his class, took a 4 hour twice a week summer class, and he really made the time go by fast. He gives you a review and is crystal clear when he lectures. I didn't buy the book, but some questions on the test use examples from the text. Overall, teachers a really fun and laid back. Everyone should take him!
                
                   Attendance doesn't really matter but the tests come straight from the lectures. You don't need the book but the study guide can help. Easy tests if you have good auditory memory. Won't bump your grade but again the tests are so easy you shouldn't need it.
                
                   I would say to not buy the book because it is confusing and you will never use it. He tells you mainly what is on the test. If you come to class, it doesn't matter. He will not bump your grade in a million years. I received a B for the class and I had an 89.44. I had done all of the extra credit and he did not care. He is a prick in that matter.
                
                   Business Law is hard, but he make it not that hard. You could make a A if you come to class.
                
                   He tells you exactly what is going to be on the test. Go to class and you can't fail!
                
                   Don't buy the book! All you need is to buy the study guide, it's his notes word for word and is great for studying for the tests! The tests are the only grades you get in the class! He's a great guy and it's a fun class to take.
                
                   he doesn't car about attandence but takes notice who comes to class and who doesn't.
                
                   He is a great teacher! I really enjoyed is class and the tests went right along with his lectures. If you go to class, it will be very easy for you.
                
                   4 or 5 tests, tells you what is on test class before. Some extra credit. Test are multiple choice w essay question. EASY CLASS! All I had to do is show up w minimal studying got a B. Didnt have to take cumulative final.
                
                   He is very boring, although sometimes funny, he rambles in his class about useless stuff. Will help if you ask, provides some extra credit, easy EASY tests, just read the chapter (made a flat 100 in his class and I hate economics and I studied the night before). He is hard to listen to (smokers voice) but you get use to it pretty quickly.
                
                   it is a lecture class and the lectures do not help what so ever, does not teach he just talks.
                
                   I love Dr Hernandez! If you do the work, you'll get a good grade. She is my favorite professor by far.  )
                
                   I love taking Dr. Hernandez. I have taken her for four classes in the past, and I'm super excited to have her again in the Spring. Her assignments are reasonable, you're given plenty of time, and she is incredibly understanding with her students. Can't recommend her highly enough. 
                
                   Dr. Hernandez is awesome. I've had her multiple times, and I'll take her multiple more times. She's incredibly knowledgeable, helpful, quick to respond to emails, super clear on projects/papers, and all around a great lady. There's nothing bad that can be said about her, I take every MKTG class I can with her.
                
                   Dr. Hernandez is one of the best professors I've ever had. Super nice, structured, and incredibly understanding. Her International Business course was 95% online, and had work due every week. As long as you get everything turn in on time, you'll do great.
                
                   shes really cool about everything never be scared to ask her questions during class or during her office hours. i had to miss some classes due to training with the navy and she was super cool about it all! i would highly recomend her.
                
                   taken her for 4 classes (3 MKTG classes), A in all classes. Super sweet, everything is in syllabus, lets you use notes on all 4 exams. final is optional. if you go to EVERY single class get A's on everything (which is easy to do) lets you skip exam 4 and gives you an A on the exam..... I always recommend her!!! Super helpful outside of class too!
                
                   Lectures are directly out of the book, but attendance is mandatory so you have to attend. Encourages class participation and group assignments/discussions. Class was really easy didn't even need to buy or open book because it was so similar to the book for promotional strategy. Easy, but won't learn much new information.
                
                   He has such a good sense of humor! Awesome professor & very helpful to his students. I took him for Statistics as well as Operations Management and learned a lot!
                
                   I didn't hate or enjoy his class. The class is as easy as you make it. There's no homework, or projects.. just test. He adds bonus points on each test for attendance. 60% of the test are problems from the problems from class, with different numbers. He really likes to joke around, and is a generally a good guy.
                
                   Dr. Hormozi is an excellent professor, and loves his 'jokes'. Attending class is definitely a good idea if you want good grades on the exams, which account for 95% of the grade in the course. He also weights the exams according to how you did on them (lower grades count less), which is awesome. He's great, I'd take him again.
                
                   Cool professor.  I wouldnt miss class though.  He hands out problems in class which are more than likely going to be on the test.
                
                   His lecture has little relevance to the textbook. I had to read the book to understand everything. NO review at all. I prefer studying by myself in the library to wasting 2 hours in his class. However, he was quite easy on the grading.
                
                   He was fun at times, but the lectures were boring. He skipped through the chapters so I didn't exactly know what to study for the exams and this was a problem and no review what so ever.
                
                   Read the book, you'll pass the class. Attendance = extra credit. Professor is helpful, can be funny at times overall class was pretty easy.
                
                   Lazy. I asked him for advice on test once, he pretty much told me to read the chapter and do the study questions. Nice man, but most of us talk in terms of him not really there if a student needs help.
                
                   Great Professor. He will help in any way if your struggling. I wish I could take him again in another class. I would/have recommend him to anyone.
                
                   Although this class was pretty tough.. It was not hard. Make sure to do every single assignment and pass with an A on each. Also, the more you go to tutoring the better the grade you'll get. As long as you put effort in, you can get an A. Plus, Professor Kruse is really cool. All the work and quizzes are easy, it's the tests that will get you. 
                
                   Professor Kruse is without a doubt one of the best Professors i've had. He goes chapter by chapter explaining everything. However, I don't recommend skipping class because he explains everything during class. All assignments are online and he offers a lot of extra credit. 
                
                   She is a respectable teacher when you see what she brings to class everyday in her lectures and how clear she is about everything.  Lots of homework but were all easy, just review and youll pass
                
                   A tough professor - exams every week, short answer, every other exam is proctored through examity. A lot of confusion on assignments, she could have made it clearer, prepare for discussion boards as those are the major part of the grade (an opportunity if you're into it).
                
                   Dr. Lucero is a sweet woman who does care a tremendous amount about her students. That being said, I have never had more assignments from one class. Dr. Lucero does give 4 tests AND a cumulative final, though the final replaces your lowest grades. Each chapter has two or three Connect sections with it, plus there are in-class exercises. Don't skip.
                
                   Teacher is horrible.  Talks to everyone like they are 5.  Has a class period for review, during that review all she does is read the slides faster, so basically no review just another class.  Lecture is her just reading the slides and giving random examples, really no help. DO NOT TAKE THIS CLASS.  Attendance is graded everyday.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS LADY!!! AVOID AT ALL COSTS!!! TAKE HER TO YOUR OWN DEMISE!!!
                
                   You get easy grades by doing the online hw quizzes that I find extremely helpful to remember terms that she goes over during her lectures. Attendance is mandatory, but she gives extra points for being there. In-class assignments, but doesn't care if they are wrong. As long as you put effort.
                
                   Took This class my senior year, and is hands down the worst teacher on this campus. Relies on teaching through connect, and treats every person in her class like they are inferior to her and have the IQ of a 7th grader. Would definitely  recommend taking the class with a different professor.
                
                   Her "exam reviews" are a joke as she basically tells you to study EVERYTHING. She is VERY unclear about what we need to study to do well in the course. She seems to be more interested in making the course unnecessarily difficult and time-consuming. She doesn't return e-mails or answer questions with a straight answer. Completely dissatisfied.
                
                   Fair in grading.  Very approachable and easy to talk to.  Points vary in attendance, 4 exams, and online work.  All in all not to much work, however.  Also gives bonus points toward the end of semester.  I liked her.
                
                   She did not teach in class. she always let her student teach other. i have no idea why i spend $600 to take this class and learn nothing.
                
                   50-75% of class time was in-class presentations.  So I didn't learn anything. Grading policy is severe and ambiguous.  Thinks you can't use notes to get full credit on presentations. Doesn't have significant real life experience and has very little knowledge of recent management trends(her research is on deviant behaviors in workplace not MGMT).
                
                   Unfortunately the class was not a good use of $600. Was excited about business school, not now.We did not really learn anything; we just did a lot of work from the textbook. You could have learned all the information from 2 good business magazines. Kind of Disappointing!!
                
                   Another classic anal old lady who loves to pile on useless amounts of homework and talk down to her students.  Very strict about guidlines and due dates and being on time to every class (b/c there's a quiz or something due EVERY TIME) WOULD NOT RECOMMEND HER, but even though I droped her class once, and still got B, she's still better than K.Peeple
                
                   She is a good professor. It's a easy class, just make sure to do everything she ask for. Don't miss any assignments! Go to class :)
                
                   Easy class with a young and inspiring professor. She offers fresh insight into the world of business and a fun learning environment. 
                
                   She is really down to Earth and makes you feel like what you are doing in important. She does what she can to make sure you understand what you are doing. She is always saying that she understands because she was a student at one time, and she lets it show in how she treats her students. She responds to emails quickly as well!
                
                   Attendance is mandatory since you do not meet every single week. Her class is easy she makes the lectures interesting. Homework is easy, no reason not to make an A in this class. 
                
                   Dr. Sherman's class was enjoyable and very productive to my learning. His course work will take time on your and your groups part but overall it is fairly easy class to pass. After your first presentation make sure to correct everything he tells you too. 
                
                   Dr. Sherman is a fair and easy going. His class is very interesting but requires class attendance and class participation. As long as you go to class you will do well because some material is not covered in the book, only in class on that particular day. He remembers his students by last name and really does care about your progress in his class.
                
                   Sherman is fair and clear. Take him over Middleton if you are undergrad. He cares about his students.
                
                   His approach to teaching is good, he gives lots of good examples, but very narrow in scope.. Be careful not to question him, the smartest guy in the class questioned him about a theory, and he got really angry even though Sherman was apparently wrong.. The poor guy got a C in class.    Advice: Do not question him in class...
                
                   Dr. Sherman is a great professor.  He works with you to make the class more interesting.  There are even hands on activities to help drive home different theories and ideas we learn about.  The test reviews are previews for the exams, and the Learning Journal Assignment is the easiest project you've ever worked on - you just have to keep up.
                
                   Everyone in my class complained about the tests but the material is straight out of the book. Very interesting class and a great teacher. One of the best in the business department.
                
                   Anyone who has her should be STOKEd!! She rules, easy homework, easy quizzes. Just do me a favor and humor her by at least looking and acting like you read the chapter. She will love you for it! It is easy to respect a teacher that respects you. Great, intelligent person.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Excellent professor, one of the best course's I've taken here at TAMUCC.  She's very smart and makes EVERY class interesting.  You'll definantly learn a lot in her class and my only regret was that it didn't last longer.
                
                   OK Instructor. Seemed to enjoy the topics, but level was too high. i would have liked to have more practical exercises in class.  He expected us to read the book before class,  and wanted to to go beyond the book, but the book was just too expensive.  But he left TAMUG, so does this really matter?
                
                   The course material can be fairly boring unless you have a prior interest in E-law. Capt Glenn is very straight forward, but his tests can catch you off guard. Read the book, take notes, and be able to back your opinions in a clear and concise manor. Know the term "Arbitrary and Capricious", it will help during the essays.
                
                   Didn't show up to class half the time but knows his stuff.  Tests are..ehh.  Its better 2g2 class and just listen than not go at all bc it will deff help when it comes to the 3 tests (15 multiple choice, 2 essays per test).  & don't wait till the last minute to do the project!
                
                   OK professor
                
                   Eddie is an ok teacher, but she is underqualified to teach the course. If you go to the Writing Lab and get help, you will do fine. You can get an easy "A" in the class, but you will have to do a lot of busy work. Unfortunately, this course is required, and she is the only prof who teaches it. Just suck it up, and get it over with for your degree.
                
                   Just listen you will do fine
                
                   Dude! Mr. Brittain was freakin' awesome.  He's the calmest, most pleasant professor to ever be around.  He's very helpful with in-class and out-of-class assignments. He's always in the business building when you need him.  His classes are never boring and he always gives a review even though all of the exams are far from difficult.
                
                   This guy is funny and a good teacher. He goes pretty fast in class but there isn't that much too know about Word. He jokes with the class at times. I have never seen this guy angry or has yelled at a student. Two thumbs up!
                
                   IT IS EASY TO PASS.. NOT TOO MANY ASSIGNMENTS.. DEFINITELY GOOD IF YOU ARE LOOKING FOR EASY A.. MAKE SURE YOU KNOW VOCAB TERMS..
                
                   Wonderful class!  Best teacher for 1302!  He's very helpful!  Easy A--especially if you are already familiar with Office Professional 2003.
                
                   Great professor!!! I recommend him to anyone who is taking a computer class. He is very nice and is willing to help his students. If he is on the list, take him.
                
                   very nice, a good class.
                
                   She's nice.  She kind of plays favorites though.  She's fair.  She gives students a chance that others normally wouldn't.
                
                   Very hard class, test are totally different as to class work and reviews. Grading sucks, tries to help but makes you get lost even more. The class work and reviews are easy but we it come to get is totally different that you do not even know what to do
                
                   Tests and quizzes are open note open book. He explains everything and doesn't move on if someone still has a question. Not hard class at all. Have to go to class every time since he gives quizzes every class period.
                
                   He is a very good teacher.He explains things very clear.Tests are open books and open notes but still you have to study.This class is very hard but he explain well.Take with him go to class and study you will be fine
                
                   Very practical method of instruction. Cuts through book's jargon and explains the application of the formulas and concepts very well. Take good notes and do your homework and reviews to reinforce what you learn in class. For our class, exams were open-note, open-book, and calculators were allowed, so it's very hard not to do well in this class.
                
                   Easy A. Do the study guides then put the homework problems on the back of them.  Open book open notes test. Dont miss class or you will be lost luckily go to the second session for understanding.
                
                   This is one of the easiest classes I have ever taken in college. He gives a lot of quizzes and pre quizzes for each chapter. All of his quizzes are the EXACT same questions as the tests. Just look over your old quizzes before the test and read the book. I am an idiot and I am getting an A.
                
                   from the 1st day of class i was lost. he doesnt transition smoothly from formula to formula. he'll jump around a lot and before you know it you're asking yourself &quot;what is he talking about&#63;&quot; if youre a math wiz you might be able to follow him, but i had to drop the course.
                
                   This class sucked. It was so difficult. He doesn't teach from the book, the book doesn't help at all. Bottom line; do your homework, study every night, don't be absent for the quizzes.  And hopefully by the good graces of GOD you will pass.
                
                   He is nice and understanding, plus his tests are not that bad. Just read the book and you will be fine.
                
                   Mr. Gallegos reminds me of a short pudgy puppy: always jumping around and always full of excitement. He is very helpful and the best way to pass the class is to listen to his lectures and remember vocab terms. Draw back: gives you a 10-15 min look back into his life... everyday at the begining of class
                
                   He wasn't difficult.  The class is very broad in subjects as far as business.  It covers Marketing, Accounting, Management and a few other things.  He's a good teacher.  He makes you think through your questions (to him) and you can solve your problems.
                
                   Excellent professor easy take home exams.  Gives corrections and curves the whole class.  You cant flunck unless you dont show up.  Open book test sometimes and leaves the room.
                
                   One of the Hardest professors I ever had. Professor R loves to make your life difficult. Only 2 tests which are worth 75% of your grade. and Also he requires 8 hours of community service. How on earth can full time students who work full time, have enough time to do that community service and still have time to study for his class? Avoid HIM!    
                
                   Meh, not bad... No need to go to class, but takes attendance. Exams are easy and she drops one. Homework constant but not hard either. Like I said: meh...
                
                   There is no use going to class, her lectures are useless. Read the book. Her accent is thick. Gives card in order for her to take attendance or who comes in class
                
                   Teacher is confusing, had grammar tests with out warning of preparation over it. Criticizes your presentation form when she can't even talk. Wears low cut shirts and are not a pretty sight on this lady. Makes constipated faces looking at the computer and has her tongue sticking out at times and gnaws on it.
                
                   Work in the class consists of 5 exams, 4 writing assignments, and 5 discussion boards.
                
                   Ditto to everything said in other comments.  Instructor has a very subjective curves on participation and effort.  People had average test scores that without the curve were within 4 points of each other.  With the curve, these same people's grades were 4 letter grades apart.  The irony is this same teacher teaches ethics.  How scary is that&#63;
                
                   Absent often, unclear in assigned homework, tests did not match lecture, never covered one ounce of business law in a Masters course for MBA
                
                   Great teacher and course. Would absolute recommend him as a professor for any class he teaches.
                
                   Dr. Reavis teaches well, provides good examples, gives insightful comments, and cares about his students.
                
                   This prof is helps his students.
                
                   Dr. Revis, has a dictatorial complex.  It is his world you just live in it.  Bit of an arrogant attitude.  I would like to give something positive to balance this, but nothing comes to mind.
                
                   Knows his stuff. Explains topics well.
                
                   Lectures but doesn't teach. You must have knowledge of Linux OS. I didn't, never used it. His lectures were Windows based, assignments were Linux based. Knows his stuff, but does not teach anything on the software or programs. Labs can difficult if you are not proficient with Linux or Ubuntu. Be very  specific on lab notes. Need more teaching.
                
                   If you know what you are doing beforehand then you will have no problems with the class. The thing is.. you would think one would actually go to school to learn, right? That is not the case with Barton. He does not teach anything.. he merely gives suggestions on completing assignments which made my whole experience very frustrating.
                
                   Professor Barton is a good teacher how has a extensive background in information technologies so with that said you must know your stuff; generalization and vague explanations and answers will not get you good grades in his class. DO WIKIS they are lengthy but great brain food. Good teacher overall!
                
                   He is very disorganized and gives little references for assignments (excluding his beloved Wikis). The section of highest value with regards to your grade come from Wikis which is absurd. Overall i would advise AGAINST taking this professor. I am a 4.0 student or i was before I had to take him
                
                   Interesting class. Remember to do the wikis early for full credit, if you don't it will hurt your grade at the end.
                
                   Professor Carter is an absolutely amazing professor! He is very approachable and is always willing to help. He offers many extra credit opportunities but the class is so easy you won't need . He is clear and direct in his lectures. He is fun to listen to. Just do the discussions and take the final and you will surely pass with an A.
                
                   In every class Prof, Carter brings so enthusiasm into his lecture. He talks about real-world problems and incorporate them  into the material depending on the course. There is a DB due every Sun. A MT test and a final, apparently also a term paper. I believe he really enjoys teaching. Don't hesitate to take his course. He responds his e-mails.
                
                   His class was real easy. he doesn't take attendance so I barely went to class. his quizzes were easy and so was the test. we were suppose to have paper, but he ended up removing that, so all we had were test. he answers emails in a timely manner and also gives the opportunity for extra credit. would take again.
                
                   Professor Carter's lectures were very insightful and he brought real world knowledge to the classroom. I loved his class! I would take another class with him.
                
                   I attended the summer semester class, it went by fast.   I feel I did learn a great deal. He is  interesting and very knowledgeable.  The class was in International Management. You do have to read and respond to the Discussion Board by Sunday night.  We had some online quizzes and a group project.
                
                   Discussion Board every week due by Sunday night. (Refers to the book Start-Up Nation. So yes, you will have to read) Two quizzes throughout the semester, but they were online. And then the group project was the final.  I missed two assignments and like six classes and still passed with a B+. Participate in class discussions and you will be fine. :)
                
                   Discussions in class were fine but he does not grade in way to benefit students. Discussion boards looked easy but rarely got the points needed. I did excellent on quizzes and test and still got B. No extra credits.
                
                   He makes the class personal and relatable. He's pretty funny to. Great professor. Not too much work and he prepares you for quizzes and upcoming assignments. He doesn't over pile you with work. 
                
                   Professor Carter is awesome! He makes you want to come to class and he is super knowledgeable. The material is simple enough and interesting. He has a midterm and final which are reasonable several discussions and a term paper. Just don't get lazy and miss assignments because he doesn't take them late and you won't get an A like I didn't.
                
                   Best professor ever! He keeps you engaged doesn't read word for word on slides, hes funny, no homework only discussion boards, 3 exams very easy, 1 group presentation, and he gives extra credit. And he is very nice and very knowledgeable you will learn and enjoy his class.
                
                   Would definitely recommend him. no homework just discussions every week. and final group presentation, 3 exams. Loved his class.
                
                   Mr Carter is amazing. Keeps the class interesting. Uses mainly PowerPoint but it helps filter the info from the text, He tells you exactly what to study for the exams, mainly definitions. Would definitely recommend him. no homework just discussions every week. and final group presentation, 3 exams. Loved his class.
                
                   I would highly recommend this professor to any Texas A&M student. His experience with various cultures and business practices helped the class to better understand the learning material. He also provided a welcome environment for open communication.
                
                   Mr. Glaser has exceptional experience in the business world!  The reason I say that you MUST show up to class is because what he reviews in the class will be on the exams!! There are homework assignments, but they are very easy.
                
                   Really good guy, only thing is he goes off topic way too many times. His stories are intresting dont get me wrong, but when you take his tests you go blank. He allows one pg cheet sheet but sometimes that doesnt help since he doenst tell you what to expect at all. He also takes forever to put in grades!
                
                   I can really appreciate Dr. Segura-Glaser's humor. He keeps the class entertained as he lectures. Tests were based on essay questions given prior to exams, but not all questions were on the essay exams. He is a highly respectful and respected professor, and I do recommend his classes. If you keep up w homework n group project(s), you will pass.
                
                   took during summer & had to miss first 2 classes.  DONT miss class in summer!! you lose too much info.  Had I been there I prob wouldve made an A.  Glaser is not always clear but very knowledgable & good teacher
                
                   You're on your own, Text are very hard, no guidance on anything, He said just ready the chapter 3 or 4 times :( u practically sit there and waiste ur time, powerpoints are online,Quiz online, 2 Extra Credit will help pass...
                
                   Dr. Glaser did not give any guidance on what to expect on the tests. He just told us to read the book,this made the tests hard. But if you read the chapters, do the homework, online discuss.,quizzes and attend at least 2 1st Sat. lectures u'll do fine.  The comprehensive final took the place of the 4 test avg if it was higher..this saved my grade!
                
                   Loved Dr. Dan! Sweetest Prof I've ever taken. Very accomadating, within reason, of course! Tests can be tricky, but study PPT & read chapters & you will be fine. Allows 1 page of notes for exams. Group proj & research papers required. Would highly recommend this professor!
                
                   Dr. Dan is very interesting in his classes. He gives a lot of work but at the end of the semester he gives a big break. He also gets involved with the students. I would take him for all of my classes if I could.
                
                   Professor Henrie is the best Marketing instructor! He is funny and has real world experience.Test are fair, not super easy. Go to class, take good notes, READ your book and you will pass. Gives some extra credit.
                
                   Guy is an awesome professor. By far the best I ever had. Im in his Sports Marketing class and it is very interesting. We have gone to Spurs, Rampage, Missions, and Scorpions games. I wish I could take him for every class until graduation. You will not be disappointed if you take any of his classes.
                
                   Professor Henrie is the best Marketing instructor! He is funny and has real world experience and for us Marketing Majors that a plus.Test are fairly easy, go to class, take good notes, read your book and you will pass! Gives some extra credit. If you don't pass this class with at least a B, do yourself a favor and punch yourself in the face!
                
                   Great sense of humor, approachable, keeps students engaged during class.
                
                   Good Guy, lots of fun, good teacher
                
                   This is the worst professor I have ever taken in my entire life. His class is boring as he has no public speaking skills. He asked us to retake the first exam twice as he forgot to give us more information, the second exam three times as he kept messing up the data and changing his questions from one version to the next. WORST EVER!!!
                
                   Don't take him, if you do don't go to class just read the book and teach yourself! Seriously I wouldn't wish this professor on my worst enemy...
                
                   He is the worst professor on campus.  He doesn't explain anything, or he tries to but he's annoyed with the fact that he even has to explain.  Be aware you'll end up having to teach yourself the material.
                
                   Great professor! Always willing to help before and after class. His exams are not too hard as long as you learn the formulas. He is easy going and does not use the book, he reads PPT's in class. Finance is a hard course, so if you want to do good you got to work hard.
                
                   He is an extremely hard professor!  I recommend study groups.  Drink coffee before class in order to stay alert. His lectures are not that exciting although one could learn a lot from his lectures when awake.  I got to amid he is a finance guru and I just wish he would be more excited.
                
                   Worst teacher I have ever had.
                
                   Worst teacher I have ever had. Does not explain clearly, and tests are not the same as study guide, you might as well just teach yourself.
                
                   Does a dry run through of financial equations, and occasionally talks about their applications in business. Puts out practice tests, and shows some leniency in grading, but be prepared to practice a lot of financial math, and learn the terms. A lot of number crunching involved.
                
                   The professor was not helpful at all. He was annoyed when the class asked for an explanation. I recommend you use caution if he is the only professor left for the semester. Half of the class failed or dropped. Choose someone else. His reviews are nothing like his actual tests, so no use of studying them just read on your own to learn the equations
                
                   AWEFUL Professor! If you like a teacher kicking you out of class prior to it even starting for talking then this my friend is the class for you. Everything was super easy, he tells you exactly what will be on all the tests. Our final was EXACT questions pulled from tests we already took and we got to use a cheat sheet.
                
                   He expects for everyone to read prior to class and for no one to talk while he is.  He is hilarious and tells you everything that will be on exams.
                
                   Though Professor Hall is very helpful, I did not learn much from him.  The class was all conceptual with no practical application.
                
                   Thank goodness I have a good math background or I would never have passed this class.  Prof. is not very focused on the material he wonders off of topic alot.  Had to struggle learning from txt & clasmates.  didn't learn much from him.
                
                   Great professor! He tells you exactly what he expects of you. He doesn't throw curve balls at you and is pretty straight forward about the class material as well. I've taken him twice and will take him again.
                
                   Ask for an online class instead of wasting your gas getting to his class, because you will get the same ammount of help setting at home in your PJs, and the work itself is pretty easy.
                
                   Good Instructor. Lots of real world examples. Interacts with students. Ask questions when needed. Recommended.
                
                   Great teacher!  Online test.  And money saving tip, the older edition text works just fine!!!
                
                   she's real down-to-earth, a great humanitarian
                
                   I will definitely take her class again.  Extremely Helpful. And yes she's hot.
                
                   real down to earth teacher-not boring, frequent testing would recommend!!!
                
                   Easy class. Have to make presentations in front of class but not pressure.  Homework minimum, test not hard if you listen and read a little.  great class dont hesitate to take this professor
                
                   Great Professor!
                
                   Very good, likable, teacher.  Grading was very generous.  Attendance is important to the professor, so don't miss too many classes.
                
                   His class was easy. We only had 5 or 6 assignment not sure why his easiness rating was lower. There was no test, midterms, or a final, what else can I complain about. You have to write some journals and like 4 other assignments. He is tough on your papers in terms of correcting them but this does not reflect in your grade. He is not a tough grader.
                
                   Mr. Jenkins is the sweetest man, he sounds like grades hard, but he's actually a pretty fair grader. all we had was 5 papers, no test or quizzes. I would definitely take him again. I highly recommend him.
                
                   Great professor - lectures are long and not needed for the assignments. The course assignments are a bit tough, you learn alot but some are pretty involved. Very interesting man but can tend to drone on and on. 
                
                   Mr. Jenkins has a lot of outside business experience that you will hear every class, so I was really intimidated by him!  All he wants for his students is to be able to properly communicate in the business world.  There are NO exams in this class, but there are 5 major papers and 1 group project/presentation!
                
                   Professor Jenkins is very informative and explains things very clear, good to the point type of teacher. He might sound a little intimidated on the first day of class about the work for the class but the work will help you develop good communication skills for any type of work.  As long as you do the work you will pass. No test's nor final.
                
                   there are no tests which is great. there is however a lot of papers due in his class. each paper is quite lengthy and extensive. There will be a group project due at the end of the semester.  His lectures are filled with a lot of personal anecdotes so be prepared to sit through those. He is an easy going man and has a funny wit. good professor. 
                
                   Great prof to take Bcom with. Lectures right out of the book but doesn't make it boring. Always willing to work with students and always willing to help. I had 4 major assignments and that was my grade. Super helpful again and clear about what he wants. I's take another class with him because I was able to stay awake through leacture at 8am. 
                
                   Very good Professor, enjoyed his class and learned a lot. Great at responding to messages and helping you.
                
                   A lot of work but Professor Jenkins is very helpful. As long as you go to class and do you work, you will pass. :)
                
                   Excellent professor...worked with the students and truly motivated us to learn.  I highly recommend as he is very knowledgeable, and not just from a book.  Real world example of how BCOM work!! EXCELLENT!!
                
                   Love this teacher!!! Learned a great deal and very easy going.
                
                   Very good Prof. He is smart and shares real life experience. He assigns all written work but if you do the work, you can pass the class.
                
                   Great professor! Do the assignments and you will do fine in this class. He is available  if you have any questions.
                
                   I took Mr. Jenkins in the Fall 2012 and he's very smart and knows what he's talking about. Does not give exams but gives out research topic and journals to turn in. He's very laid back. He's not too demanding.
                
                   Not much of a writer at all but really enjoyed this class.  I learned A LOT!!  Prof. is extremely helpful.
                
                   This was an online course. There were a lot of papers and no multiple choice tests or quizzes.  Your grade is based on the papers you submit.  He was fair and gave you plenty of time to submit your work.  He was very clear on what was expected and it was very easy to submit you work online.  I recommend this professor 100%.  I enjoyed this class.
                
                   Excellent course.  Instructor is very helpful and accessible.  Very lenient with work load, which at times can be overwhelming.  Great lecturer.  Class favorite.
                
                   Awesome, funny, interesting professor!! Take him!
                
                   Jenkins is awesome!  Alot of work but it all applies to the real world. I'm not even a Business major, just needed a speech class, but still got by just fine.  I would definitely take him for another class.  You will learn alot but it will all be enjoyable and well worth any effort you put.
                
                   Great professor! He is flexible with attendance as well as assignment due dates. There is a pretty good amount of work. Assignments actually apply to the real world.  Syllabus is accurate...stick to it. He is funny..and extremely helpful. If you are confused about an assignment, don't be afraid to call him. I would take another class with him.
                
                   Easy class. Quizzes online after each chapter open book but timed. Written assignments are extensive but you have plenty of time to complete them. Offers plenty of easy extra credit worth ALOT. No midterm or final. You can't beat that. Easy class. Recommend the hyflex course it's that easy.
                
                   Prof. Love gives great lectures! He sets up the class with Aplia which provides lots of study tools. Aplia reads the chapter to you!!! Quiz after each chapter. There's 5 writing assignments 1-3 pages. One article review that's 4-6 pages. Bonus opportunities. Real stickler about critical analysis in writing assignments.
                
                   I really loved Mr. Middleton's class. He's such a nice and funny guy. I would take another of his classes if I had a chance. 
                
                   Ask for clarification.
                
                   Professor Ullom is a very nice guy but a very vague teacher. He gives vague explanations on things during lecture, however, if you read the book and come at him with a specific question he will help you. Basically in this class you are on your own for a lot of it. Tests are online except the final. Read the book and you will do fine.  
                
                   One of the best professors I have taken here at TAMUSA. He is fair, engaged with the students, and a good sense of humor. He reviewd material before exmans becuase the book we were using wasnt the greatest. He always answered our questions we had and the material and examples he presented were easy to understand. Will definitely take again!!
                
                   Great teacher!All you have is discussion boards, exams and one EASY paper.She grades fair on the discussion boards and I got an A on my paper,and I'm not the best writer. There is an extra credit but she asks for way to much just for 1 or 2 points so I didn't do it. Other than that it is a great class, I would recommend her to anyone!
                
                   Online course is not for everybody. This class was by far the easiest class to take. No proctor. She didn't have a study guide but hey we are in upper level course so we should know at a minimum how to study. Her grading was fair. Communication was great through email. Take the class. You have to read to learn. Hence online course.
                
                   Disappointed w/ how little I learned.Only assignment is a weekly journal requiring a min of 3 sentences-no feedback on this until end of semester & is 25% of your grade!Exams hard to study for,a ton of questions w/ an unreasonable time limit.She gives no help with exam prep whatsoever.Very poor communication.At times, didn't email me back at all.
                
                   It's true that Dr. B is disorganized however, she's very helpful. She reply to any questions you have. Her class is hard because her finals is comprehensive. I highly recommend this instructor. I love the fact that the briefs are due at the end of the class.
                
                   I am nearly done with this course and I am unable to tell you what I am supposed to be learning. Everything is vague! She rarely returns my mesages and I'm confused about all major assigments. There are 2 tests and I failed the 1st. There were incomplete questions, questions that did not ask a question with choices, and it was a complete mess.
                
                   He really cares about the students and wants to see them suceed.
                
                   easy
                
                   Good class,read the book and ask questions if you do not understand, very nice guy and good teacher! I would take him again.
                
                   Pay special attention to quizes
                
                   Mr. Dale is awesome. You do have to read the book because he does quizes everyday, but if your attendence is good he will drop the lowest quiz grade. He also gave my class free hundreds on lots of our quizzes. We had to do an interview paper but that isnt hard at all. We also had to do a group project but if your group works well its an easy a
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Extremely helpful and knowledgeable. Also very patient and understanding. Excellent appearance and demeanor. Highgly recommended.
                
                   Very easy teacher. Class is not mandatory but you may want to show up for the review days. He gives you all the questions on the test on the review day. The class answers the questions. So be ready to write so you can pass the test. Study the review and pass the test.
                
                   Distinguished; friendly; courteous; personable. Students team up and prepare assigned lessons via ppt. for presentation each class period- then any gaps that may not have been covered he covers; he encouraged class participation and was adept at achieving results; VERY helpful with tests and assignments.
                
                   Not a hard class, I think we just switched to a new book so he didn't have his assignments organized, easy course. sometimes his instructions are confusing. so you have to message other students for help. He will not reply to emailsBB messages, and if he does it will be super late. Easy course, not that much work to do it in. Exams  Kinda hard.
                
                   ACC530 Current topics in Auditing. We completed 3 writing assignments that were 1 page each. The final I wrote a three page paper but no length was given. Very easy easy teacher. Easy A but you don't learn anything! No book required for this course.
                
                   This was an online class so all questions must be asked via email. However, he rarely responds to emails-I had a question that took a month for him to respond to. Take any teacher but him if possible!
                
                   This teacher was by far the worst teacher I have ever taken. Does not answer any questions, doesn't respond to emails, and doesn't seem to have a real grading scale. I would not recommend taking this teacher for any class.
                
                   He responds very late to emails. Grades take up to 3 weeks to be posted for assignments. He is not very helpful if you need assistance
                
                   Both classes were online,he does not reply fast or help really. You pretty much teach your self.
                
                   This professor has no structure to his class. We had 4 very easy writing assignments that ranged between 1-3 pages long that he made up as we went along. You will pull an A as long as you do the required assignments!
                
                   He is not organized at all. There is no structure. There was a syllabus that accompanied the course, though he did not follow it. He also assigned writing assignments as he made them up. The entire course I did four writing assignments, all between 1-3 pages long. I would not recommend this professor, though he is the only audit professor there is.
                
                   Easy class but he refuses to respond to your emails. Also, he does not grade on time. It usually takes him a month to grade your assignments. Overall you do not have to attend class because you can do most of it at home. Got an A in the class so take it for an easy GPA booster.
                
                   I generally dont particiate in these type of reviews, however I obeserved that the people who have bad opinions about this professor are doing bad in the class due their inability to put forth the effort that is required or just plain incapable of understanding the  material and blame the professor because of their incompetence. Learned a lot!!!
                
                   Terrible! She is pissed because many of her Masters classes she took in Italy were not accepted in America. Has no desire to help anyone. I had to learn everything outside of class. She is hard to understand and doesn't explain anything very well.
                
                   Horrible.  Absolutely horrible, and she is not fair whatsoever. More than 70% of my class failed our test. At times she can be rude, and expect you to know the criteria. She does not curve adn is not flexible and makes you feel as if she wants you to fail. So many people have failed her class. I can not imagine why the school still employs her.
                
                   Terrible!  She is hard to understand and is not clear on her expectations.  She will tell you to do one thing and then the next class period say that is not what she meant and take off points for the miscommunication (even if it's the whole class).  Try to find another professor at all costs!
                
                   TERRIBLE!  This professor does allow you a very hard open book test. You must know the material inside and out.  You also must do a presentation and crazy research paper.  You must be 100% accurate on citation or you will be turned in and failed for the class.  If you are not a top orator, she will fail you on your speech.  Say bye to your 4.0
                
                   Very hot headed.  She once asked our opinion on a test and we told her.  She was very upset because the class average was failing that she told us she is going to take the curve away and she did.  She does not care of your situation at all, even military going to the field.  She is not a very good communicator.
                
                   That's strange...I loved Ms. Eads. She does expect a lot but the work is a breeze. I have had her for 2 classes and I have made high A's in both. She is very passionate about her field in Human Resource Management.
                
                   Hardest grader  and a lot of "busy"  work.  Hated her class!  She used some stupid rubric to grade. 
                
                   She gives you a lot of "Busy work" I would not take her again, she is very picky with her grading and counts off for stupid stuff. I really think most of the work in her class is obnoxious! 
                
                   I took this class in an 8 week session online it was A LOT of work. There was 10 quizzes, 16 Discussion Post and 5 Exams. She did a good job as far as organizing the material and making it easy to understand but she was a bit snarky with her announcements and class emails though.
                
                   Class is not difficult if you do the work. It doesn't have much to do with her teaching style, which is fine, but the curriculum is just common sense and definitions. The quizzes and tests are not difficult if you study a little. My average on the exams is a 95. Anyone can pass if you do the work which can be time consuming and busy work-ish.
                
                   I definitely recommend Ms. Eads.  She is a young energetic teacher who truly enjoys the subject of human resources.  Class is structured in an easy to follow format that hold your attention.  Test and quizzes are not hard, if you pay attention in class.
                
                   Dr. Garner is a knowledgeable man with lots of experience under his belt.  He shares his real-world knowledge with the course in an interesting way. Very helpful, available outside class for students.  Not an easy "A" course (thankfully!) and requires you work, but you also WILL learn and retain information from his classes.
                
                   Professor Garner is an excellent teacher!  His stories relate to real world experiences.  Relevant projects but you have to do your work.  He will help if you ask.  He is honest and fair.  His classes are not easy, but he gives plenty of time and resources.  I took many of his undergrad courses.  Would have loved him as grad prof. but moved to CA.
                
                   By far one of the best grad professors I've had. Tells us what he wants, makes sure we understand, gives us examples, and then lets us alone. Does not have easy or unreal expectations. Gives assignments that truly facilitate learning and give a real world view into the realm of HR law. Would take him again!
                
                   willing to work with anyone provided you try
                
                   Taught from PowerPoints. Good all-a-round professor. Take home test made you read and learn the material. Fun contract group project at the end. Has good stories to share.
                
                   8 wk class. Had to write a 1-2 page paper &quot;portfolio&quot;, APA style on 18 chapters each. At the end he let us slide a little on not covering all chapters in the &quot;portfolio&quot;. My paper was 31 pages. A lot of work for a undergraduate summer class. 2 of the 3 test were take home and easy.Powerpoints not very useful and not much discussion. Rushed lectures
                
                   taken professor G for many classes...great all around. He loves telling stories and gives take home tests.
                
                   Great teacher. Very professional
                
                   Good teacher....easy classes, open notes and book tests
                
                   He's a good professor and gives a decent to follow curriculum
                
                   This professor  was very unorganized. He wasn't sure what was on his own syllabus. The class itself wasn't hard.  He basically just throws you out there. Just make sure you study those definitions and you'll pass the 3 exams because he doesn't provide a study guide.  There is no final exam. 
                
                   This is an addendum to my previous rating, the professor does cover the content in the book
                
                   When this professor goes over the material powerpoint he takes too much time on each slide and discusses real world scenarios rather than book content.   This is great for personal development but it is difficult to pass exams with this type of teaching style, especially with no content review
                
                   Dr. Geigle has a great personality. You can feel the passion he has for this subject. Homework assignment & quiz due weekly. Term paper w/presentation required....option to work with group. Highly recommended, would take him again.
                
                   Gives option to take final test or write a paper. Should have wrote the paper because this was my only B this semester. If I had written the paper I would have did better. Test questions were like finding a needle in a haystack. The material and book was easy to read, but the test factoid questions are really easy to miss. I learned nothing here!!
                
                   Prof. Geigle is awesome. The final is great because you can choose between writing a paper or take the final (multiple choice). I decided to write a paper because it is easier for me rather than reading the whole book. I recommend this professor.
                
                   Class was straight multiple choice exams with a 2-3 page case study. Final was comprehensive. The tests are open book with no time limit so can be passed easily. The questions are a bit ambiguous and can be tricky. Final is 100 MC with a 2 hour time limit. Can make an A  with a little effort, B with none.
                
                   Instructor will ignore you and avoid real communication. Es specially when he is in the wrong.
                
                   Great teacher! Allows students to work as a team on research projects.
                
                   Very good teacher. Very funny too! He is awesome all the way around. If you take him you won't regret it. He is really good at what he teaches, no matter what the subject is. Very professional and knowledgeable as well =)
                
                   Professor La Lone is a great instructor.  His expectations are clear and he gives good feedback that will help you in all areas.  He is very approachable and is willing to help when you need it.  Very down to earth guy, not high and mighty like some other instructors I have.
                
                   I have professor LaLone for Global business and Business communications. Both of those classes have the same review.  As long as you put some kind of effort in your work, he will give you an A on it. His tests are simple, no scenarios. 
                
                   He is a great instructor, but you have to study for the exams.  He lectures in class but tests from the book. I rented my book, and it is essential. 
                
                   Prof. LaLone is very disorganized. However, he will help you with any questions you have. He's very knowledgeble with the class that his teaching. I highly recommend him.
                
                   Very good prof. He tells you what's expected and he sticks to it. Presentations are not hard, you just have to do the work. Quizzes are available but not mandatory. I would recommend this prof!
                
                   Very Good professor overall! Had him for several classes, not always easy but not extremely difficult either. All assignments/requirements are clear and detailed. He's always willing to help! Always managed to make an A. He gives plenty of info to help you in your career.
                
                   Prof. LaLone is fair, comes across a little rough, but has good information, so LISTEN! Lectures in real time info, so not on test, so read the book and know terminology and understand how to use it, not just definition.  Very fair, helpful and really cares about success of his students!
                
                   Use the books website very helpful. Lectures mostly do not cover what will be on exams.
                
                   My favorite profesor.  Know the key terms like the back of your hand.  Will not get out of class early and may stay over.  But I don't mind I like listening to him.
                
                   Very good teacher. As long as you make the efford you'll be ok. Very easy to understand, patient and very knowledgeble. Communicate with him if you have trouble with the class he'll be there for you. Fair grading :o)
                
                   He is a very nice teacher and answers all your questions.. even on unclear questions on the tests. Talks real fast though and tests really aren't on most of what he says in class. I would recommend not studying the pps. but read book thoroughly because the exams counts the most for final grade.
                
                   he comes across rough, but is actually very easy to work with!
                
                   good teacher....never get out of class early..some take home tests...read the book and study power point slides and you should do well
                
                   When you do the homework make sure to answer the question and add to it. Giving examples is good and it is important to be thorough. She wants the answer and then the results of the decision(s) etc. You will understand when you read the homework problems. Test are a breeze if you read the chapters. Responds quickly to emails!
                
                   Online lectures are long, but learn a lot from it! Test are off of the lectures, so take notes. Would take her again! Very helpful, replies to emails very quickly. 
                
                   Middaugh was on of the best professors at tamuct. I wish  I could take her for more classes. Took online employment law class. She wants you to pass and she even puts power points with her voice recorded explaining the martial in each slide.  If you didn't understand the book readings watch the power points! THEY ARE USEFUL FOR TEST.  
                
                   Ms. Middaugh is a fantastic teacher. Those who do not do well in her class are not putting any effort. She is incredibly knowledgeable and will help explain things if you do not understand. She seems a little intimidating at first but that is because she is a lawyer. Shes wonderful! Study her powerpoints and ask questions...and you will pass!
                
                   She has audio lectures with accompanying power point notes for each chapter. She tests over those lectures. She responds quickly to questions and is extremely helpful!
                
                   Wonderful teacher! She has audio lectures with accompanying power point notes for each chapter. She tests over those lectures. She responds quickly to questions and is extremely helpful!
                
                   I had her for Business Law II and it was fantastic! She has audio lectures for each chapter with power point notes. She is clear in her expectations and tests over material covered in her lectures. Her additional assignments are relevant and interesting. She responds quickly to all emails and is eager to help. Take this teacher!
                
                   Awesome instructor!
                
                   She is very knowledgeable however,she has no idea how to pass that knowledge on to students. She crams a lot of information into one day so you don't get the opportunity to really learn anything that you will remember for long-term use. I wish I would have learned more. I expected more out of TAMUCT.
                
                   She was one of the most useless professors ever.  She never gave clear instruction and when we asked questions she treated us as if we were idiots.  She talked down to us incessantly and it was nauseating.  She never reviewed for a single test, which by the way there were  two worth 25% of your grade.  Basically she is inadequate & ineffectual.
                
                   The worst teacher I've had at T-CT. The class revolves around her world and what she wants to talk about, probably 10% of the class came out of textbook. Does not follow schedule at all. She has a bad attitude if you don't understand something and is extemely unclear about expectations. Avoid this class!
                
                   She doesn't review for any test. The only thing we talked about all semester were resumes and surveys. Has no idea about fundamentals of teaching. Tests are 25% each and they only way to study was to read 10 chapters for one test. She doesn't make the tests either, she uses the ones that come with the teachers book. Very rude lady  . Don't take
                
                   DO NOT TAKE!  Does not lecture on book material. Test bank exams. Inpatient and rude. A lot of people agree with me..as around. BTW I got an A in the class..taught myself. Lots of time with my nose in the book!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She's very thorough, and this is is one of the first in-person classes she has taught. I felt she did a great job face-to-face. She and the department understand that students are busy with family, work, and other obligations, so she was very cool about not requiring consistent class attendance. The curriculum was challenging, but not grueling.
                
                   Enjoyed the class,  she is active with the class, gives good feedback and participates with all discussions.  Have to say it was one of the better classes I have taken. You will write a lot of assignments, nothing to tough, exams are tough but doable and she does offer extra credit it need be.  Well organized course with an engaging professors   
                
                   She's a nice prof. who gives good feedback, however she's all over the place. 1st, directions for assign. are a page long. 2nd she spams my blackboard daily with random posts which confuses me even more. Seems like she tries to be organized but it's coming off as opposite of that. I've been taking online classes at TAMUCT for a while so its not me.
                
                   Great teacher! Took her online for Business Communications.  3 exams, discussions, 3 professional communication papers, 2 summary papers,  and a research project due at the end of the semester. She constantly interacted with the class and gave excellent feedback. Be prepared to write!
                
                   Great class, on point instruction, she makes it fun. Come to class and do your work you will pass.
                
                   She sometimes takes a few days to respond to emails but don't wait until the last minute to ask her a question and you'll be fine. Plenty of discussion questions and a final proposal project that can require some work. Read the book and supplemental material and you'll be okay for the tests.
                
                   This is a WI class, so that is to be expected. She grades pretty easy, follow the rubric she gives you and its pretty easy. Dont wait to complete work the day its due. It is a lot of assignments per week but is not hard if you can do one a day its really easy.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THE PROFESSOR FOR ONLINE COURSES. Assigns too much work! Those discussion board posts required by online classes? She assigned 4 in 1 week + peer post replies. Made us buy & sign up for an online APA course too, with lots of work & an exam! Often assigns multiple chaps. of reading too. This class is interfering with my other classes.
                
                   She was a great professor. I did not think I would like this class but I learned a lot and ended up with an A. This is a writing intensive course and can be difficult at times but Ms. MacDonald is very helpful I do feel like she grades fairly. If you put in the effort for this class you can get an A.
                
                   Absolutely the worst facilitor at TAMUCT. I felt cheated by taking her class. If you can read you need not attend her class because she will just read from the course prepared slides.
                
                   Great Teacher. Very fair. Understands working proffesionals taking class. Read the book/slides and you'll do well.
                
                   AWESOME PROFESSOR!!!!
                
                   Fun Class. Allows for alot of class debate on ethics issues and other stuff. Test were fair and she gives a good test review. Required a group presentation and chapter work. Do the work and you will get an A.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great professor. Had to do an individual presentation and group presentation. Would take her again. Not a lot of homework.
                
                   good teacher, she gave great reviews until some ppl complained she was too easy..have to do at least one presentation in most of her classes, but overall she is a good prof. to take
                
                   She never responds to emails. She waits til finals week to grade half of your assignments. You are kept in the blind for most of the class. The syllabus says things are due one day and she emails saying it due earlier and when you confront her about when its really due she ignores you. A lot of homework. Expect 3-5 assignments a week.
                
                   This class is extremely simple. If you do the work, you will get an A.
                
                   Easiest class ever!
                
                   This class is very time consuming so let me advise you now NOT to take this class in conjunction with other classes during the summer. Its a BAD idea because she assigns LOTS of writing assignments including a 5-10 page (body only) project. You will struggle like I am to balance time between other classes, work & family. She is nice & tests are ok.
                
                   easiest upper level class I've taken, hot teacher. Extremely nice and helpful. 
                
                   she's beautiful and on top of that I had no test all semester long she's an easy grader and easy to talk to If you need an advanced elective take her its like a free A if you put in the work she ask for 
                
                   Great teacher! You will have to use the book to better understand the lectures but she covers the material with true examples. I wish she taught other courses!
                
                   Took many classes with her - she is a bit of a strange bird, but is a veritable wealth of knowledge.  She does not teach off powerpoints - she inserts real world scenarios to illustrate points from the chapters students should have read before class. Assignments are helpful and relevant - she will go out of her WAY to meet students outside class.
                
                   Online class... Very fair. Responds very quickly. Assignments are plentiful but easy to do. Reasonable time frame to complete assignments. Easy to understand and follow her instructions. Quiz's can be taken twice to guarantee good grade. Exams are hard but feasible. Very nice lady, I recommend her!
                
                   Mrs. Lyon is a nice lady. She makes me laugh because she is a but silly. She doesnt lecture a whole lot on the book. She does t really care if we are there or not, as long as we turn in the work. She is very busy, but she gave us her home number so I have no problems getting in contact with her. Her assignments are not hard at all.
                
                   Dr Lyon, is one of the best Professors at Texas A&M. She is very helpful and understanding. Teaches real wold experiences in HR and MGMT. Be prepared to do a lot of work, but this is a Professor that I definitely recommend.
                
                   Took her for most of my HR classes.  If you want someone to read your book to you, take a different class. She does lecture on her experiences in HR which gives real-life picture of what we will encounter as professionals. She is tough: expects you to do your own work, she will not do it for you. Knowledgeable and FAIR. LOVE HER!
                
                   Dr. Lyon is a bit quirky, but knows her stuff!  She does NOT read off a PPT nor from the book.  You must read the book on your own.  She DOES give LOTS of real life experience lectures, so if you want someone to read your textbook to you, she is NOT the professor to take.  Extremely helpful, ridiculously knowledgable.  TAMUCT's best kept secret!
                
                   Best teacher I've had at this school, Im a senior. she will make you work for your grade but is very smartand helpful. must read your text book. shes not an easy A but curves generously and usually pushes assignments back if its in our favor. highly reccomend
                
                   have taken Lyon for both grad and undergrad classes.She expects ALOT from her students, but more than once she allowed me to turn in hw late without penalty. Most of what I have learned for the real world in HR, I learned in her class. btw She curves on her tests because she understands that each Mul Choice test has a 10% inherent error rate.
                
                   i went to class one week and had to drop because of her ignorance. she assumed that her class should be all your taking, totally out of touch with students
                
                   Prima Donna-a temperamental person; a person who takes adulation and privileged treatment as a right and reacts with petulance to criticism or inconvenience.
                
                   Worst class ever. All she does is talk about her self and then pretty much says know the book. Are you kidding me&#63;! Take the class with anyone else. By far the worst college experience of my life and I am a senior!
                
                   Terrible!!!  Take Ethics online with ANYONE else.
                
                   Extremely vague. Lectors not related to book content. Too many pointless stories about Tarleton's shortcomings. Tests are confusing; she curved 10 points on every test. Something wrong with that picture&#63; Paper requirements too broad and not thoroughly explained. Looses homework students turn in.  Too much on her plate: hard to contact :(
                
                   very vague
                
                   Great Teacher and will help you anytime you need it!!!
                
                   Her lectures are pointless and unbelieveably BORING!
                
                   Little full of herself. Doesn't do to much teaching, just talks about herself alot!
                
                   good teacher....knows her stuff...doesn't teach from the book, but tests come from the book...so need to read
                
                   This is a stats class, and he has a really thick accent. He is really helpful but can be hard to understand, the easiest way to communicate is via email. Dont skip homework.
                
                   He has a very very very thick Korean accent, its not impossible to understand but you have to focus on him and the material to understand. He tries very very hard to make sure you understand the material. The homework is straightforward as long as you get at least 85% he counts it as 100% participation. If you dont get 85% you get a 0%. Dont quit! 
                
                   As long as you do the work, you'll pass. His lectures can be confusing, but everything is cleared up in the review.  I definitely recommend him as an instructor. Don't  buy the book!
                
                   Easy A. Do the work on time and you will not get lower then a B.
                
                   Online class. Class concepts were difficult at first but the professor offered options for us to come into the classroom if we wanted to.  We were given powerpoint presentations and explanations for each chapter. This helped when doing the assignments. Very fair.  Gives a sample test prior to each exam recommend doing them does provide solutions. 
                
                   Great professor, this was his first semester teaching, so he is still trying to get used to the concepts, will help you out if you do not understand, do the work, follow along as he does stuff on the board. i made a high A, some stuff gets tough, but practice it, and test are taken at home, so you can use your printed notes which he provides. 
                
                   Easy class. I just graduated 2 years ago, so this was super easy for me. It was basically a refresher from all the AP classes I took in high school. The older folks in my class had a harder time understanding him and the concepts. He is a new professor, so he seemed to still be getting use to explaining concepts. I would take this class again. 
                
                   Online MathStats class. Guy DOES NOT respond to emails for assistance until you're nearly dead in the water. COMPLETELY unhelpful.
                
                   Yes this course is writing intensive but she's very great on feedback. You will also be required to do some Service Leadership hours and the projects are totally worth doing. I know I will continue to help out with those projects as much as possible. The professor is really wonderful, polite, cheerful and overall AWESOME!
                
                   Overall, Professor Robin is very helpful and consistently provides useful feedback. She's very supportive and she's willing to go the extra mile to ensure student success in her course.    Warning: As a Business Ethics writing intensive course, be prepared to write on a regular, often weekly, basis! There's no getting past that in this course.
                
                   MR WELLS IS AN EXCELLENT TEACHER. TOOK HIM ON FORT HOOD CAMPUS AND I TELL YOU I LOVED HIS CLASS. GREAT TEACH WOULD TAKE HIM AGAIN AND AGAIN AND AGAIN. ALL TEACHERS NEED TO BE LIKE HIM. I REALLY ENJOYED THIS CLASS. IT IS NOT A HARD CLASS AT ALL EASY EASY EASY A! 
                
                   love this class and teacher very nonchalant class doesnt last more than an hour i will be taking any class he teaches
                
                   Easy Class, Test were super easy.. would study that same day before taking the test and always got higher than a B.
                
                   Took this class as an 8 week course on Ft Hood. It was quick and painless. Professor Wells covered the entire book in that time. Group project  does a powerpoint and lectures for the chap. lecture. Not much homework, excellent review for the tests. Class was supposed to be for 2 1/2 hours but was usually only lasted an hour. Great class!
                
                   Dr. V is a great professor. He has a real interest in what we learn and does a great job with tying the book to real life. I played the Globus game for the first time and at first it was real intimidating but his GA was real good at making sure we understood what was going on. I suggest you make use of both him and her for help if you need it!
                
                   Dr. V is the greatest professor at the university. He genuinely cares about each of his students and makes you enjoy going to class. Everything we learned was something that could be applied to the real world. Honestly, I wish I could have taken more classes with him but he only taught the exit course to the grad program, but would def recommend!!!
                
                   Dr. Vitucci is one of the most influential professors in TAMUCT. He genuinely cares about his students' learning experience. In fact, he makes himself available before, during, and after taking his class. Dr. Vitucci's class provides the real world experience for a student to earn &quot;the competitive advantage&quot; in entering the workforce.  MUST TAKE!!!
                
                   Great instructor.  Will help in any way he can.  Will work with you if you have any issues.
                
                   The best professor so far at the school.  He is very helpful, humble and a nice person.  His classes are as easy as you want to make them.  I like him as a person because he is doesn't think he is a God because he has a PhD.  There are other with less education, and a smart mouth.
                
                   Easy class. It was a MW course, but only had to go to half of the classes. For one month straight, he only required us to go for one day a week. Tests are pretty easy.. all online and open book. The final was easy questions. One group presentation 30 min. long, which grading is kind of hard. Overall.. I would definitely recommend this teacher.
                
                   He does not teach;  you're basically teaching yourself. Forget about getting feedback on your errors. This man is just there for the paycheck, nothing else. USELESS!! I received an A in this course due to the tutor provided by the school. Apparently he is the only Statistician in the local area, because he is the only stats professor at the school.
                
                   He was and great but very hard professor. Know your APA Manual cover to cover!
                
                   This class requires high discipline & lots of writing. Complete all of the assignment implementing Dr. Simmons feedback, you should receive an "A". No group writing assignments. Each assignment serves as a purpose to prepare you for the research paper. This class should be taken first in your masters program, its your foundation for other courses.
                
                   As long as you keep up with your homework and discussions you will get a good grade. 4 exams = 28%. 15HW worth 33%. discussion questions worth 33%. Pre and post test worth 3% each. Did ok on the exam and still made an A in the class
                
                   The HW is worth more than the exams. As long as you go to class and ask questions it is easy. At times the class can be time consuming but the way everything is structured makes it easy learning and as long as you do everything, it is an easy A.
                
                   The course is very challenging but was worth it. I enjoyed his method of grading. The homework was worth more than exams which is extremely helpful. His lectures were a little boring, but that comes with a statistics class. As far as his helpfulness, he would say to ask him anything but when you did you wouldn?t get much help. I received more help 
                
                   Very good teacher. Very helpful if he knows u need help! I like his teaching method. A lot of work on research, but that's what's expected of the course itself. Very interesting class. If u are not lazy or looking for an easy &quot;A&quot; you'll enjoy it. Take him, don't listen to lazy people! He's very knowledgeable. Follow his guide n u'll be good.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The clarity of his/her grading criteria is abysmal at best. I understand that this is an online class so a lot can get lost due to the lack of student teacher interaction, but this is the worst I have ever experienced. The grading of discussions was very confusing. I jumped from A's to D's because I used my opinions in a comment?
                
                   A great teacher that makes you think and brings the best out of a student. More  teachers  should follow her teaching methods. 
                
                   He is amazing! Inspirational and hilarious- he really makes you think about yourself and your life goals. This class won't be an easy A, but it's not hard either. THIS CLASS REQUIRES WORK so don't slack off. I came in thinking there would be no work but I had to write essays every week, go to night speakers, and had a huge group project.
                
                   Dr. Musoma is pretty cool. His lectures are interesting and he always brought in good guest speakers. He is funny and loud but sometimes overbearing. The class takes a lot of time outside class, which I wasn't expecting, and some of it seemed pretty useless (especially the group project). However I met some of my best friends in my small group.
                
                   This class was more work than all of my other classes combined;he's super nice. The grading is mostly not done by him, so your grades will differ depending on who's grading. But the grading is ridiculously tough and horrible. Expect to have a b or c maximum for the majority of the semester. DO THE EXTRA CREDIT! That's what will get you up to an A.
                
                   Dr. Musoma is a great prof. His freshman business class seems very intimidating at first but as long as you show up to class you will make an A. He gives you books to read throughout the semester and we had 1 pop quiz that just covered a few questions from the book and random questions about what is going on in the world around us.
                
                   While this course was an easy A, you really have to put a lot of work in. The course is divided into one day of lecture and one day of small group per week. There's plenty of extra credit to be taken advantage of. Prof seems intimidating at first but he's actually very cool and down to earth.
                
                   The class is not hard, it's just a lot of work. You have one day that is just lecture, and one day that is small group. Overall I enjoyed the class, and there was enough extra credit that you should have an easy A. Be prepared to work though.
                
                   Dr. Musoma is an amazing professor! He truly cares about his students & even had myself & a couple other of my peers over to his home for breakfast! When he lectures, everyone pays attention. There were some guest speakers though who were snooze worthy. The class seems like more of a self understanding class & difficult to see purpose in until end.
                
                   I LOVE DR. MUSOMA'S CLASS. HE IS AN EXCELLENT SPEAKER AND EVEN BETTER PERSON. I really enjoyed taking his class. some of the projects were difficult, but there is a lot of extra-credit. It is actually really hard to not make an A.
                
                   He's a cool guy the lectures are amazing there's just a lot of random homework assignments and busy work
                
                   Freshman "Business" Initiative is recommended to every incoming Freshman Business major. However, it is arguably the most useless class I have ever taken. The long, weekly lectures are merely life lessons that do not relate to the study of business. Assuming you grew up in a decent household with caring parents, you'll get nothing from this class.
                
                   I genuinely loved this course. I feel much more prepared for Mays after taking it! The huge group project is a pain and they don't put in basically any of the grades until the very end of the semester but if you do all of your assignments, getting an A should not be a problem! They also give so much extra credit so take those opportunities! 
                
                   Love Prof Musoma, but not a huge fan of the class. At NSC they push this class and doesn't seem like it would be hard, but honestly this class took the most of my time doing the homework/project. The class is inspirational and different, but most likely won't help you decide on a major if that's what you're looking for. Class was not well organized
                
                   This class is a LOT of work. If you have a heavy course load, I wouldn't recommend taking it. The work is fairly easy, but very time consuming. The group project is worth most of your grade. Dr. Musoma pretty much makes sure that you make an A in the class as long as you do the work. Show up to class because 3/4 of our pop quizzes were attendance.
                
                   Love Dr. Musoma! Great guy who really cares about his students! Class isn't really about business but worth taking. GO TO CLASS. He gave full credit for 3 quizzes based on attendance. If he knows your name he'll call you out in class for fun. Some of the assignments are tricky, but don't lose hope because there's a lot of extra credit!
                
                   I really love Dr. Musoma. He is a wonderful person with great lectures. However, we had an abundance of guest lectures and tedious work. I know people who loved the class and people who did not. I ended up switching out of the business school and his class was key to me realizing this was not the major I wanted. The class was ok but not great.
                
                   Group projects, recommended books worth reading but didn't have quizzes on them, and ethics-based lectures.  Musoma is a great character. He is animated and extremely enthusiastic. Monday lectures were unpredictable but worth going to.  Would recommend this class if you want to take it as an ethics course. Didn't learn much about Mays or business
                
                   I LOVED Dr. Musoma. His lectures are more like inspirational life coaching sessions than lectures. Only 4 quizzes over the required books and lectures. You don't have to read them, but I would recommend reading for good life lessons. There seems to be a a lot of busy work but it is worth it in the end. Easy A if you stay on top of assignments!
                
                   55% of your grade is one major group project. Very inspirational, very funny, great speaker and lots of guest lecturers! However, you have to make a portfolio that is a TON of work. This class gives me the most work out of any of my classes, but you learn a lot about what Mays has. Don't take if you have a really difficult schedule, but take if not
                
                   Dr. Musoma is a very passionate and enthusiastic professor whose class is easy grade wise, and very useful. 
                
                   Dr. Musoma is a cool guy who cracks some jokes and cares about his students a lot. Everyone loved him, and it's not that I disliked him, I just didn't enjoy the class as much as everyone else did. Small group was great and some of the speakers were interesting, but honestly I didn't feel like I got anything out of Dr. Musoma's talks.
                
                   By far the worse I have ever had anywhere! He talks about how great he is and you are not. He is an owl and you are a turtle and squirrel. He belittles you and then tries to make a joke of it. He doesnt prepare for class and seems clueless at what he is teaching. Bores you with pp slides and reads them verbatim then tries to explain them.
                
                   Good Professor, class is fun, he has us to group assignments, very helpful. Read the textbook! gives a study guide for the exam which shows which parts to read before the exam, DO IT! Would take his class again. Assignments aren't that hard the Management Portfolio will help you understand the chapters better do not procrastinate on this portfolio.
                
                   It was important to be in class because of the group projects .  They were kind of fun.  You also had to do journals.
                
                   This class should be a writing intensive course it was that much writing. The professor is funny with his writing but you have to do 16 post to 1 DQs and there 8 DQs. The DQs are also the bulk of the grade to include the final which is essay style. There is one group project.  He had us do too much for a real estate class. It felt like a law class.
                
                   This is a very dedicated professor. He checks and interacts on the message boards daily and was always there to help! I was hoping Real Estate II was able to make, but not enough interested students. I recommend this professor highly. This course was easy, easy to learn and the book was decent as well. Take this class if you have a chance to!
                
                   Good professor helpful and knowledgeable.
                
                   I loved her. Took her for Communications. She starts out pretty tough but it gets better. There is a short paper once a week & an essay test every 2 weeks. Long group project w/ presentation at the end of the semester. Tests come straight from the review! Do the work. Follow APA format & good grammar. Study the reviews. Pass the class. I made a 97.
                
                   He is very organized and punctual.  His tests are over the PP's and lecture.  He pulls the info from the book, but you have to be in class for the case examples. He doesn't count attendance, but it is necessary. I would recommend him if you are a serious student.  I would definitely take him again.
                
                   Good Professor, sticks to his syllabus. Made Business Law interesting to me. Study and you should be fine. Allows 2 pages of notes on exam (WHICH ARE VERY HELPFUL), plus gives lecture power points slides to you, so make sure you print them out before class. Would take him as a professor again! Good Luck!
                
                   Challenging, but very helpful.  If you do the assigned work on time you will get a good grade.  He has a syllabus and he stuck to it, which I appreciate.
                
                   Prof. Loafman is very helpful. He will respond to your emails asap. His class is very hard however he is very fair. I would recommend his teacher.
                
                   Great Prof! He is fair... your grade will reflect the work you put into it.  He is very clear from the beginning what is expected and doesn't stray from that.  Read his syllabus... he sticks to it... if you think you can handle the work than you will be fine.  I work a demanding full time job & took his 8 week course, I would suggest the 16 weeks.
                
                   Loafman is an extremely intelligent professor. Only problem I had with him is the exams are worth 23% of your grade and there are three of them. If you don't listen in class the exams can be really hard. Class was still very interesting though.
                
                   Prof. Loafman was a good professor and I enjoyed taking his class online and in-class lecture. Although he isn't very helpful with questions, he is very knowledgable in the subject matter. I would recommend him to any student and plan on taking him again soon for International Business!
                
                   Fell in love with BLAW because of Loafman. Lectures are relevant and you have to READ. Fair, clear, helpful, energetic. Didn't plan to take BLAW2, but changed my schedule to take it as elective because of him. Gives his phone# and encourages you to call for help or clarification. Not easy, but fair and you have no choice but to learn. My fave!
                
                   The course itself it is very interesting and he provides some good information. Make sure you know your material very well because he will look for that.  Attendance is mandatory because there is good cases and handouts he discusses, but if a chapter is not covered he will have available in audio ( not particular happy about that). Overall the cour
                
                   Busn Law 1. I had little interest in this class prior to signing up for it. Now I'm in love with this subject. He makes you think. LOTS of writing but its very fun if you like critical thinking. As long as you back up your argument with fact you get the credit (assuming you don't jump into the deep end).
                
                   Very well rounded professor, Teaches all material off his PP slides. Listen to his lectures and study the PP slides you will do very well in his class. Able to use one 8X10 papr for notes on exams.
                
                   PRetty awesome guy....stern but fair.  WOuld definitely take every class I could with him!!!!!
                
                   Very good teacher. Attend class! He goes over all chapters for the day as stated in the syllabus. Also, review the slides...some of the info there is not in the book. He knows his stuff. Fair grading. Always available if you need help, online or over the phone :)
                
                   Great professor who was very knowledgeable on business topics. Wasn't too interested in the beginning, but he can hook you in. A lot of the test material is covered in the book and some are from the lecture. Highly recommended.
                
                   had for BL I. easy to get a good grade..if you work for it. material gets into some pretty in depth stuff ... need to study a little every day to keep it fresh in the brain. he's always available, promptly returns emails, and grades papers/tests usually within 24 hours.  stay on the homework, follow instructions to the letter, and you'll get an A.
                
                   Perhaps its just the subject matter, but unlike GB 432, this class was pretty boring and covered information that is not needed in general business--that's what we pay lawyers for.  Be careful when turning in papers--always use too many commas, even when unnecessary, or you'll get points deducted. Overall, was disappointed.
                
                   Good instructor.  Class attendance is not mandatory but if you don't attend, you won't do great on the tests. Too many case studies though!
                
                   Young, energetic instructor. Very good lecturer.  Clear and to the point. I was never bored. Understandable tests. One of the best at Tarleton!
                
                   HORRIBLE EXPERIENCE  The Group Project will make a A student a C or D student. She determines the groups through profiles you do in the 1st week.  She does not get involved or assist with group interactions, issues or concerns. Simple a HORRIBLE experience. Would not recommend this course or this teacher at all. 
                
                   I really enjoyed Dr. Liou's class. It was really fun, she is very helpful and will answer all questions on time. You must read the textbook if you want to be successful in her class. It was an online class and we had to complete a project and do a presentation, so be ready to do the work we supposed to do as students. Not hard at all.
                
                   This is an online class with way too much group work. If I had a chance to do it again, I would take it with a different instructor. The individual assignments are easy, but trying to work with people in an online class is painstaking. It is expected that you work in a group for a research paper, presentation, and 4 assignments. Did not enjoy it!
                
                   An Amazing Class. It is hard, but the topics are interesting. Textbook is a must! Exams are hard and in an 8 week class there are only 2 exams.  Big research proposal, but presenting the end result is fun and exciting. I probably wont make an A, but that is my fault, not hers. She is very helpful and answers all questions. I would take her again. 
                
                   The test were really hard.  I think everyone in our class has a "B" or lower.  A class like global business shouldn't be extremely hard it should be interesting and fun.  She reads directly off the slides & her study guides are worthless.  She gives you extra credit.  Do it!! Because you will need it.  Avoid this teacher!!
                
                   This is a business research class so expect a lot of writing. As long as you follow the syllabus, follow the research proposal checklist, and do the work you will get an A. You have to put in the work to write and research for the research proposal. You submit a big research paper, but you complete portions of the paper throughout the semester.
                
                   Ms. Berrios is great.  She helps her students when ever she can.  Her strong suit is APA and papers so she makes them hard.  That was the hardest thing in both the classes I took from her.  Over all great teach.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very good teacher, very helpful and down to earth.
                
                   Haven't taken the class yet, but this teacher was listed on a list of teachers to take for easy/recommended classes. So I am real interested to take.. plus she offers an 8-week course.
                
                   This class was tough! She squeezed a lot of work into an 8-week semester. She's definitely a tough grader as far as writing goes and the group project was torture. If you hate group projects andor writing, don't take this class. Other than that, the work was pretty manageable. Exams were easy and so were all of the extra assignments.
                
                   Great instructor really enjoyed the on-line interaction during the on-line course study.
                
                   Great 8 week online class!  Well structured.  Complete homework and chapter readings as scheduled and tests will be a breeze. Only a few essays and one paper required.
                
                   I took Dr. Altman online and I really enjoyed the class. Dr. Altman is nice, professional and the material is not hard to understand. The information is also very useful in the business-leadership setting. Thumbs up and totally recommend!
                
                   She is AMAZING!  Never really liked online courses but she REALLY helps you and made me change my mind about online classes.  She communicates promtly, grades almost immediately and her tests, modules, and assigments are just overall helpful and useful.  She is a teacher worth taking. You won't be dissapointed!!!!
                
                   Took as a five wk internet course. Very interesting. Highly Recommend. Quiz and exams not timed except for final. Allows for extra credit. Very helpful and prompt with responses to any questions.
                
                   Material is very interesting.  Will benefit from tremendously! Test were not time therefore it takes a lot of pressure off.  She gives enough time to go over material for quizzes and other assignment dues.   Understanding and responds quickly to question you may have. I would defiantly take another class with Professor Yelton.
                
                   Professor Yelton was more than fair and very flexible with students.  Class was easy because many of the quizzes were not timed.  Learned quite a bit of knowledge which applies to everyday life. HIGHLY recommend!
                
                   She took great pleasure in singling out students to humiliate or make an example of and embarrass.  She then would profess to not being an Egotistical Professor as she goes on to list her accomplishments; over and over.  She also would go on infinitum about being organized and yet would be, herself, disorganized and forgetful.
                
                   Hybrid class- discussion boards due every week, 4 assignments, and one group project. She is very knowledgeable , very helpful, answers emails same day. I would take another class with her.   
                
                   always helps students!  Very interested in you learning not just going through the motions.  Very supportive.  Always available to you.  great sense of humor.  loves to discuss in class not just lecture.
                
                   Dr. Waggoner  is an AWESOME professor and very passionate about teaching.  Her lectures were so awesome we would loose track of the time. The work load was very organized, and she was always willing to help if you didn't understand.  Hybrid class, quizzes online,  one group project. NO final exam. Would definitely take her for another class. 
                
                   She is an amazing teacher!! I had her for my human resource mgmt class and she did a great job as a professor. She is the reason I am still a business major. Great teacher!! Highly recommended :)
                
                   Dr. Waggoner is an excellent professor who cares about her students. Her Training and Development consists of 2 to 3 individual presentations per class, weekly discussion question, 3-4 exams/quizzes, and a final project. You stay busy but it's not that difficult once you get started.
                
                   great professor.  this is the second time i have had her.  very interested in students learning and therr success but she is not going to just give it to you.  always helpful.
                
                   Professor Voges was GREAT! I am so glad I got the opportunity to take one of her classes. I will not say she is easy to pass, but as long as you do the work and study, study, study for her tests you will pass. She was very nice, friendly, and willing to help you on anything you had an issue with. I would definitely take her again! 
                
                   First class at this school. IT was TQM and she was awesome, friendly and helpful.
                
                   Well organized with clear instructions. Good experience.
                
                   Mainly read from the PP slides. Conversations can go off-topic at times. The assignments are fairly simple. The exam review sheets are only somewhat helpful. Study and you should make an A or B on the exams.  Has team project that is fairly simple, just turn in the team assignments on time and do the project and you'll make an A or B in the class.
                
                   Really liked this class.  Loved the professor!!  Hope I have the chance to have her again!!!
                
                   Loved Prof Voges...would take her again if I could. Tests were tough, but she gives reviews. Lots of writing assignments and she assigns a group project. Loved the Toyota Field Trip. Read, study and do all the assignments and you will do fine.
                
                   She is tough, she gives lots of papers, and is very picky with grading. Her test are very easy, overall she is a good teacher.
                
                   GREAT TEACHER HAS A  SENSE OF HUMOR TOO.
                
                   Great Instructor!!!
                
                   Mr. Vinaja actually teaches you the material. He doesn't just lecture and then lets you learn on your own. This class was a hi-flex so you can log on and see him lecture.  You can use his previous lecture videos to do your assignments. Getting group members to pull their weight blows. From the 5 professors taken, he is the best instructor I have ha
                
                   He is AWESOME!!! So understanding, very helpful and is very knowledgable of what he is teaching. I took him for 2 classes (database design & SQL and System analysis & design) and would take him for more!! 
                
                   This was the first class I took. I chose to take it in the summer because I didn't want to waste my time on this class in a 16 week time frame. I'm glad I did. Professor Vinija by far was very helpful when I wasn't able to install the SAP program needed for in class simulations. I highly  recommended. Do all the work. You will be fine.
                
                   Very good professor! Highly recommended
                
                   Very good professor. The class is not stressful. He will help you if you need help. Very accommodating, he cares about his students.
                
                   Dr. Vinaja is the bomb! I highly recommend him...Very professional and very helpful.
                
                   I was scared of statistics before taking this class.  Good professor.  Very helpful!!
                
                   Excellent professor, is willing to help you succeed in his class.
                
                   This teacher knows how to teach. Just do the homework and go to class.He gives muliple attempt on the homework and medterm. Every easy class and an easy A but as a person he if very nice.
                
                   Awesome teacher! Really helpful and does his best to help you out!!  The material might be hard but he can help you out as long as you keep trying and not give up!
                
                   ATTENDANCE MANDATORY. GREAT INSTRUCTOR. DO THE HOMEWORK, PROJECT, STUDY FOR TESTS, ASK THE QUESTIONS AND YOU PASS.
                
                   Goes over the textbook material thoroughly. Is usually easy going, helpful, and works with students to make the grade. Makes use of a lot of online which makes things easier. Goes through material a bit quick, but I would rate him in the top 25% out of 30 professors I have had.
                
                   Dr. Vinaja is very nice and easy going. All tests are taken on line in the Hybrid class and are unlimited. The tests are not very hard if you review the chapters. He does require 1 essay. Make sure to attend class and turn your essay in on time and you will do fine.
                
                   Dr. Vinaja is flexible with timelines, available to help, and replies to emails promptly. Be prepared to teach yourself and buy a homework manager ($28-$50)! Dr. Vinaja is soft spoken making it difficult to hear him, rushes through his short/vague explanations. All tests are online and you are allowed to take them multiple times.
                
                   This class was hard. I took it in Fall 2010 and passed it with an A. It was a hybrid class and you have to work hard to earn that grade, not easy but he is available if you need help.
                
                   I LOVE LOVE LOVE THIS TEACHER. EASY GOING, HELPFUL, DOESNT TAKE ROLL, TESTS ARE HARD IF YOU DONT PAY ATTENTION IN CLASS.  I PLAN ON TAKING HIM FOR ALL MY BAUD CLASSES.
                
                   Was flexible with some of the grading. His class isn't hard, and he made himself available often, and was quick to return questions or emails.
                
                   If you plan on taking him make sure you look at the powerpoints before going to class and be prepared to teach yourself. He'll cover most of of your questions but, is still sort of unclear. I would only take this teacher in the summer because, he cuts alot assignments out such as, one essay, group project and case study. He is a decent teacher.
                
                   Extremely Difficult - Weekly Exams online through Homework Manager ($50).  Only a few questions are explained after the exam has been graded, so if you want to review for the midterm, you are out of luck.  Lecture is quite pointless because he talks about statistics instead of showing you how to do statistics.  Research papers are meaningless...
                
                   This class is VERY HARD.  He fly's through his power point presentations and unless you can't teach yourself statistics then you're in for a troublesome semester.  Good luck.  I had to drop this class and I take school very serious so I hated to drop it.
                
                   Stats can be a hard subject but professor Lewis is a great instructor and she tries her best to make sure that everyone is understanding the material. She is very funny and understanding. She gives plenty of extra credit work. I would take another class with her.
                
                   Only gives a few tests, mid term, final, and 2 projects so if you don't do 1 assignment it really lowers your grade. Mid term and final were hard and not enough time is given to take them. Projects were not clear and did not get much help when asked questions. Test on the other hand are easy just make sure to do them. Does curve grade.
                
                   Very straight forward. Kind of had to teach myself, but it was a fast paced class. He provides the slides and the hwquizzes are real helpful. If you do your homework and study for the tests you will be fine. I enjoyed his class and am taking him again the summer for Stats. It just depends on what kind of learner you are. I really enjoyed his class
                
                   Worse teacher ever.  He only reads off slides and when you ask for help it feels llke  doesn't want to help you or answer your questions.  The entire student body complains about him and nothing gets done about him.  I had a 4.0 until this class.   Now all I hope to get is a C :(.  Also there are NO tutors to help you either. You are on your own!
                
                   Worst teacher EVER!!! no help at all.Down to 8 students at the end of the semester. Had an 4.0 GPA before this class. No homework  only Aplia/Cengage. basically just goes up there and reads PowerPoint word for word. No teaching on his part. You are on your own!!! Will Never ever take a class with him again.
                
                   Online quizzes are easy but make sure you get 100's on them. Two projects are super easy. Midterm/final difficult so prepare and study a bit. It is open book but difficult. You have hour 15 min to complete 25-30 questions which is not enough time to most if not prepared. Gives curve on both bc there's a lot of people that do poorly. Study a lot
                
                   The Professor's style forces you to think, understand the problem in order to determine the best solution; key skills required in the business world.
                
                   Quizzes were easy and gave plenty of time to complete.  The material was understandable but only because I knew the material prior to class. He does not answer any questions or tries to help you.  Horrible "teacher".  Test material is easy only if you are able to complete within time given, which you wont be able to, only gives one hour for 30q's.
                
                   I didn't like that Prof Krause gives tests with unreasonable time limits. A lot of homework is assigned but doable. Should be an easy class to pass but time limits on tests is very stressful. Wouldn't suggest this professor if you can take another.
                
                   By far the worst professor! he expect us to learn everything by him reading off the slides! his projects are jot clear and he is very rude when we ask a question! try to avoid taking this course with him.
                
                   By far the worst professor I have taken at A&M. He reads off the slides and does not teach students how to do the math work. You would expect him to give lots of examples since its a Statistics class, NO! he just reads the slides. Horrible professor, if you want to be confused the whole semester and not learn anything he's the professor for you.
                
                   This is the 2nd class I've taken w/Krause, and it's not any easier..it's worse. Where before you didn't need his assistance bc the book gave great guidance, this class is opposite! Unless you complain, he will continue to simply read off the ppts, which are sometimes INCORRECT. AWFUL, but if you print out everything then you might be ok.
                
                   He is probably the worse teacher I've ever had he doesn't explain the problems, doesn't teach! I thought the work was easy just very time consuming, mid-term and final are in class you will not have time to finish i guarantee you! you have to be prepared and have printouts of whatever notes you will be using and even at that you will not have time.
                
                   If you don't know anything about Business Statistics you're in for a bad time. I recommend another professor he does't really explain much, power points can be little to no help. He always ask if you have any questions but answer your questions with other question. It started of with 24 people in his class and at the end only 14 were left.
                
                   Statistics as a hybrid Summer course was not easy. I would suggest that everyone take the course in the Fall or Spring. He did not work any problems to completion on the board, and the slides were not totally useful, but with a little help  from a group we all did pretty well.
                
                   Hybrid course required a lot of homework, but it was easily completed with time management.
                
                   I wouldn't say he is a bad or good professor. Overall he does his job well and has a general interest in seeing his students learn, but teaching isn't his calling in life and it shows during the lectures. His assignments aren't unreasonable and he grades fairly. I would take him again but not for really tough material like stats.
                
                   online tests are easy. Projects don't have many guidelines, and he grades as if they did. Mid term is open book, but you WILL run out of time if you don't work FAST. 3/4ths of the class wasn't finished when time was up.
                
                   Seems like a nice guy but really gives little interest to your questions.  He taught the class as if we were supposed to have an understanding of the material.  Everything was supposedly "obvious" according to him.  Gave an outrageous number of problems to work out on major tests.  Less than .1% of the class actually finished the midterm and final.
                
                   Possibly the worst professor Ive ever had. I,fortunately, found the material to be easy. But if you had a question, prepare to be ridiculed or ignored. This professor is snobby, lazy, and lacks basic etiquette. I took him for a short summer course. If I had to sit through a full length course I probably would have physically struck the guy. AVOID!
                
                   Subject material is not for the faint of heart, math skills are required.  Subject matter and Teacher expect and demand applying yourself thoroughly.  You experience good and critical business techniques typical in the marketplace in this class.  Bosses expect you to think from their point of view, teacher introduces you real world activity.
                
                   Not real personable.  I would avoid her but cannot for business stats.  Good luck
                
                   Professor Hurley does not explain much of the info, she gets in ther and gets out and if you ask a question she lloks at you like your dumb. The class is easy if you can teach yourself!
                
                   GREAT TEACHER, GREAT SENSE OF HUMOR
                
                   GREAT TEACHER. Clear and made understanding stats easy. Maybe the only downfall was some of the videos need to be updated. kinda corny. you will enjoy this professor and will learn something.
                
                   Great Instructor, great class!!
                
                   Awesome teacher, very clear and smart. She is super helpful, and she keeps it interesting. I would love to take another class of hers if I had the chance.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I took this class online in Spring 2014. She was always quick to respond to emails in less than 24 hours. The HW and Tests were all thru the book and VERY VERY EASY! I cannot express how easy this class was, but it was also interesting. It's very easy to fall behind, so write down the due dates on your calendar.
                
                   I took this class online Spring 2013. I have to say that I enjoyed the class and learned quite a bit. The online hw is easy and doesn't take long, everything is in the book. Discussions are helpful and she is very nice lady;  she always asks if we need help she keeps in touch well.  I would recommend her class. ( I'm minoring in business)
                
                   Great Instructor, good sense of humor, straight forward, good personality. Will work with you on assignments, test are straight forward, assignments are not over whelming.
                
                   He's the best in the game in all of West Texas. I'm surprised by how much I'm learning with ease with his help. Such an insightful, wise man, and he's so handsome too. If I could, I would take every class with Kareem Dana!
                
                   As a former computer scientist, there is no other professor in WT who can teach you how to code any better than Mr. Dana 
                
                   Mr. Dana is a great teacher and easy on the eyes, too!!
                
                   Only had her for 2 weeks, need more time to give more info.
                
                   Most exam material is taken straight from book, which means alot of reading. Class attendance helps because he does review prior to the test, and recaps each chapter at end of class. Show up to the class after exam to get curve points; if you are not there, you will not get the extra points. Study in-book quizzes, and online supplements for exams.
                
                   Must attend class to recieve a review for what is on each test.  Some answers from online quizes.  Hope you like to read.  Still a very nice man.
                
                   Excellent Professor in this campus. His class was challenging but fair. Greately care for students. In his class, you need to work hard but, in return, you learn a lot. Highly recommend him to other students who want to learn.
                
                   Hard to understand.  His essays will tear you apart. Lessor of two evils at this school.  He does seem to drop worst grade.
                
                   I had him on ECON 2302. He made the course extremely understandble. He gave us two exams and two group projects. His grading was fair. The group project gives you a chance to practice and test what you have learned. But be careful, some students just want to FREE-RIDE others effort. They really deserve a &quot;F&quot; which I hope they got it.
                
                   I had this guy for Micro. He couldn't explain anything.  All he does is draw graphs on the board and talk to himself.  There's only 2 tests and 2 group projects during the semester.  On the short answer for the test its either right or wrong, he doesn't give any partial credit, no in between and they are 15 pts each so good luck.
                
                   Nice looking! HOOOOOOT!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I just like the way he teaches and relays the message very nice and easily.  
                
                   cool guy, just had 5 or 6 tests and a short paper throughout the semester and the final was optional. 
                
                   Dr. Cicala is hands down my favorite professor I've had in my entire college career. Keeps class interesting and humorous, while at the same time actually teaching his students rather than just giving online quizzes and exams. I would recommend taking him for every class possible to anyone wondering!
                
                   Smooth lectures, easy going professor. 
                
                   Horrible teacher. Couldn't remember the smallest of details about anyone or anything. Should not be teaching at all. Quick to drop points and even took away extra credit because of student complaints.
                
                   if u take it online google the quizes otherwise you will get an F on them.  No compasion got a c instead of a b copy and pasted final with others results that were perfect still a c.
                
                   This teacher is crazy. She doesnt tech well. Vey picky on grammer. She teches backwards...she should be teaching criteria at the beggining instead of the end, its flip flopped. She thinks she knows everything!
                
                   Hint: Print out her study guide online, highlight all of the answers to the multiple choice questions, (morning of the exam) read over all of the questions and (just the) answers, take the exam, and you'll be guaranteed an A. I didn't realize that till the third exam and failed the first 2. Got A's on the rest. G'luck, hopefully she won't change it later.
                
                   This class is not very hard, but it requires alot of unnecessary time.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I had a horrible time in her class, she's very pompous (&quot;call me Doctor B.&quot;) and not very compassionate.  She wouldn't round up my 79.98 to a B despite the fact that I participated in class and had perfect attendance.
                
                   I Hate this woman!  She is an Idiot!  Do everything assigned and be very careful about details and especially grammer.  That can make the difference in a letter grade.
                
                   Great Teacher she has a great attitude, very very nice. Easy class, just alot of fluff assignments, its basically an amped up public speaking class.
                
                   you need to bust your a$$ to get a good grade (i got a B), but you walk away w/ a good amount of knowledge. it was my hardest class but i did enjoy it (most of the time).
                
                   No Comments
                
                   EASY CLASS!!!  Just alot of busy work!
                
                   Wonderful!  She is one of the sweetest and nicest professors you will ever have!
                
                   This professor is real high quality and helpful.
                
                   This professor is very high quality and very helpful.
                
                   Very high quality. Would definitely recommend taking Dr. Weeks. He is very helpful and knowledgeable on many subjects.
                
                   Boy. This professor sure is smart. Very high quality. Would definitely recommend.
                
                   Interesting class! Professor is very high quality.
                
                   NIce guy. Divided tests help students. They were still pretty rough. Good class
                
                   New class. Overall, taught well. Tests a little long and hard but not too bad.
                
                   First time for this class to be offered. Learned a lot. Very knowlgeable.
                
                   Boy. Lots of work in this class. Pretty hard material. He did split the tests to help tho. Very helpful outside of class. I don't think i would have passed otherwise.
                
                   Best professor at TAMUG. Should be the dept. chair. Very high quality.
                
                   Very high quality. Would definitely recommend.
                
                   This class is lots of work. Lot of material on tests. He broke midterm and final test in two tests to help tho. One thing i did appreciate was his smartness. Not sure i would have passed otherwise. i would not suggest taking this class if you are not smart in math. Best prof in MARA i think.
                
                   Hard class but very willing to help. Lots of math which I was not expecting, but prof is very smart at math. Best professor in MARA!
                
                   Yikes, pretty hard class. Weeks is the best at TAMUG tho. Definitely the best choice to take. I wouldn't take anyone else.
                
                   Very interesting class. Would definitely recommend.
                
                   Lots of math in class. Wasnt expecting that. Prof did help me anytime i asked though.
                
                   First time class. Interesting!
                
                   Tests are hard, but i like it. Am learning a lot
                
                   I acutally enjoyed this class. Learned a lot.
                
                   Dont think Weeks teaches this class anymore&#63; class wasnt bad tho. one thing i liked was bringing in daily, recent articles to discuss. it was fun and interesting. Nice guy willing to help.
                
                   Many articles that you are required to read. One major paper. The tests are not tests of knowledge, but if you can find the article the question comes from and you can withstand the 10 to 12 hrs strait that it takes to complete a test. Did not learn much. Articles didn't help & were from a conference in France she attended when our class took it.
                
                   Dr. Mileski is a great professor for undergraduate and graduate students - I have had her for both now. What you need to know: 1) she expects her students to produce quality work and think for themselves; 2) her office door is ALWAYS open; 3) she does not tolerate laziness and 4) get to know her, work hard & show an interest and you will make an A.
                
                   Not very high quality.
                
                   slept thru this whole class got an A just bring in news articles dont even have to read em. open book take home tests=your golden
                
                   I am shocked to see such low evaluations of Professor Wingfield's classes. I have had her for five different classes. She is far from perfect but I would say she is easily better than a 1.4 average. She tells you want to study for the test. You either study and pass, or don't study and struggle. She also gives extra credit just for showing up. 
                
                   In my experience, Dr. Wingfield was very unpleasant to have as a professor. She did not give clear (or any) expectations for exams, she rarely let us out on time (she would only go over on time by about 4-5 minutes most classes), and she seemed to talk very loud. I asked a question in class one time. Her response was neither clear nor professional.
                
                   You can be nice or you can be miserable. I think she is miserable. She is a horrible grader, and she is very nonspecific in what she wants of her students. Avoid. 
                
                   DO NOT, I REPEAT DO NOT TAKE HUMAN RESOURCE PLANNING (MGMT 4385) ONLINE! YOU HAVE A SEMESTER LONG PROJECT THAT YOU DO IN GROUPS!! HER VIDEOS AND ASSIGNMENTS ARE TERRIBLE. THIS IS MY BIGGEST REGRET IN COLLEGE! PLEASE SAVE YOURSELF!!!!
                
                   this class is easy as long as you read the chapters and do the work. I made the mistake of trying to take a short cut and had to bust my butt in the end just to pass.
                
                   This is one of the worst professors iv had. She was always late or absent. She does nothing on her own all classes are word for word reading a few slides off the power point provided from the text book publisher. All quizzes and exams come from publisher as well. But class was easy and I did not go to class once after the first month.
                
                   I've taken him several times, HOWEVER, will not take him again because he snapped at me for going up to him after class to simply ask him a question. He treats his students like children and he's never answered any emails I've sent him. Also, his elementary-themed classes are all pretty much the same since he is lazy, so don't waste your time.
                
                   Great Teacher!
                
                   I LOVED Dr. Blanco! He was strict about phones but he made the class enjoyable. I would gladly take him again! He is a great instructor and really makes you think about the things that REALLY matter in life. He will challenge your thinking and play devil's advocate. If you are easily offended, don't take him. 
                
                   Great class! You will learn. You need to study for the quizzes. Attendance is  a part of your grade and Dr. Blanco is very stern about that.  However, he is a great professor and you know he cares! I not once didn't want to go to his class.
                
                   learned a lot from his class. hes really knowledgeable of his field and say a lot of stories which make it easier to learn! totally recommend him , and would take him again. 
                
                   Dr. Blanco is very knowledgeable in his field, and the assignments and tests are clear cut. Don't miss class if you expect to pass. . However, I would not take him EVER again. He is rude, and arrogant. Myers is a much better professor in terms of respectfulness, and clear cut assignments and exams 
                
                   Blanco is known around campus as a hard or mean man, but it simply isn't true. Dr. Blanco is knowledgeable, caring, and explains all the projects as plain as day. You HAVE to attend, and you HAVE to pay attention. I also wouldn't bring a cell phone if I were you.
                
                   Blanco is an amazing professor and he comes off as a jerk so that he isn't taken advantage of. He knows what he is talking about andiI learned a lot from his class. If you do what your told and go to class you will be fine
                
                   Dr. Blanco is awful. He constantly talks about how great he is. I ended up dropping his class after a month because his lecture style was frustrating. I didn't learn anything from Dr. Blanco. I took Dr. Myers' Business Communication class and loved it.
                
                   Oh man. This guy. Dr. Blanco is more obsessed with himself than anyone you'll ever meet, teaches his class like an elementary school classroom, and has a serious problem with promoting the AMA. He puts people down left and right. However, the class is right out of the book and SUPER easy once you get past his self-obsessed, egotistical nonsense.
                
                   just show up to class and you will pass easy. has alot of stories and fun class.
                
                   Basically just read from the text. Just quizzes after each chapter but had little to do with lecture.  Prepare to read each chapter to do fair on the quizzes.
                
                   This was the worst class I have ever had! Not clear on anything he wanted for a major report we had to do. NOT approachable at all!!! Avoid for this class!
                
                   Terrible cynical man. Only knows how to put people down. He is constantly belittling others and likes to boast about himself. Avoid him as much as possible. I know I am. I can't stand even bumping into the guy in the school halls. RUN!!! Unless you like being bullied by a mean teacher!
                
                   he is the best professor ive ever had! His jokes and stories are relevant to the material he teaches, so it makes class enjoyable. Attendance is a must! He does cared about his students, its a fatherly tough love. He not only reaches his students but also prepares students for the real world. best you'll ever have too!
                
                   Absolute joke of a professor. Extremely bias and disorganized. Puts himself above all other professors and even doubts their work load. Inconsistent with grading, and shows bias to other males he may have interest in. Deserves every bad rating he gets.
                
                   He is very knowledgable about this class, and also very interesting in leturing. Homework is not heavy, tests are not very hard if you pay attention on class. Have group project, he will assign your group members. Attend to class is extremely important.
                
                   INTRO TO BUISINESS.. easiest class ever but hes really annoying.. his voice drove me crazzzzzyyy. he reminded me of louie from life with louie.. lol couldnt stand him but the class was wayyy easy
                
                   Great Professor! Extremely intelligent. GREAT EXAMPLES. Attend his class and you will pass with flying colors. Do all his work too. Careful on quizzes cus he puts stuff he doesn't say but is in the book. Looking forward to taking him again
                
                   Great Professor! Knows his stuff EXTREMELY SMART!!! Cares about his students and wants them in class. If everyone attends he's happy. Funny too! EASY CLASS. There will be a presentation in the end of semester in which he chooses your groups...good luck
                
                   His class is tough, but if you pay attention you will pass. His classes go by fast. I have recommended him.
                
                   Professor Bell gives more real-world, helpful examples than any professor I'll probably ever have. He works as a lawyer in addition to teaching, and it shows. The only downside is the lack of outside help, but if you show up, take the quizzes, and pay attention you'll do fine.
                
                   Professor Bell's Business Law class was a fun experience. He made his class fun to attend. He tells you what will be on each quiz. Tests weren't tough if you pay attention in class and review the quizzes. He hands out all the info that will be covered in class so no need for a book. Highly recommend his class!
                
                   Very good professor. Gives you everything you need to study for exams. He has small quizes at the end of each class which are very easy. His exams are not that difficult. He lets know which essay questions &quot;might be&quot; on the exam. He is a really good professor and I highly recommend anyone to take his class.
                
                   I took Mr. Bell once a week on Mondays and really enjoyed his lectures. He is a Great Teacher and uses good examples. His tests are tricky but if you study you should nail them. Show up to class and take quizzes and  receiving a good grade is in the bag. I would highly recommend him. Great Teacher.
                
                   I took him during the summer session evening class. Fast class, just alot of reading.  He is an interesting teacher.  Can be funny at times. Grades fairly.  I learned some interesting things in his class
                
                   Good prof. even though he isn't a full time teacher so it might be difficult to get a hold of him. Keeps u interested in the class, there is never a boring moment. The class isn't hard and the tests are based on his notes.
                
                   Great professor!! I hated economics before I took this class and he made it interesting. Homework was easy. Tests were kinda hard but only if you didn't study. One paper, could be done individually or in a group. Sadly, this was his last semester. He told my class that he accepted a position of Dean at another university's College of Business.
                
                   Great prof! Makes something as boring as economics seem interesting. Lecture-based. Take good notes and keep handouts. Tests are hard if you don't study, grading options are given. Gave make-up exam at the end of the semester. Only three exams. Can be exempt from final, depending on grade. One paper. Take if you can!
                
                   I am a former student of Prof. Benavides at another university back in the early '80s.  I remember that he put a great deal of effort and enthusiasm into a potentially dry topic.  He was one of my favorite instructors.  I just Googled him to see if he was still teaching somewhere.  Glad to know he's well thought of at Texas A&M!
                
                   One of the best classes I've taken all year! he is absolutely my favorite professor.  He gives out &quot;banana&quot; awards if u make an A on the test.  Plus, he'll push tests back if the class isn't ready.  No powerpoints, he just has a huge conversation.  He is very enlightening :)
                
                   Very good teacher. I highly recommend. I have a lot of respect for this man.
                
                   He is a very kind person. i think everybody likes him.
                
                   Dr. Benavides is a wonderful teacher! I have so much respect for him, and he is very passionate about what he does. I believe that everyone should have the chance to take his class. Economics is a boring topic, but he always seemed to make it interesting!
                
                   This is a great class to take!  I HIGHLY recomend this prof. He has a cute sense of humor.  He really knows how to teach econ!  He made the class really fun!
                
                   He is very good. He keeps everyone involved so it is easy to understand everything. He has lots of energy so don't expect to be able to sleep through the class.
                
                   very awesome teacher. loves his students and very enthusiastic about everything. is always willing to help....funny too
                
                   Nice enough, no lecture.  You have to know what question(s) to ask. So, be prepared to study several books.  Lots of work and 2 tests per week plus 4 papers.  Just went through the motions in this class.  Some classes need a little bit of lecture.  Stats is one in my opinion. Is kind in the grading dept.
                
                   One of the only C's I ever made in college.  Waste of time.  I have no idea what he graded us on.
                
                   This class was difficult. The professor was always ready to help out during office hours, and even from his home. I would suggest taking the practice quizzes at least 10-15 times, so that you can prepare for the exams. Also, particpate often becuase it is 20% of your grade. Good Luck!!!
                
                   It was difficult course, and had too many things to do, but the professor was available for office hours on phone and online chat, and helped explain the problems multiple times.
                
                   Syllabus was very difficult to follow.  We were expected to purchase 4 or 5 things in addition to the text.
                
                   Don't take this professor!!! He used &quot;Non-mandatory&quot; web conferences as his only method of teaching his online class. He told everyone he would record them to view later, but he did not do this and avoided answering students questions about it until he was reported to the Dept. Head. Didn't learn a thing and will have to retake the class.
                
                   Very nice guy.  He will help you as much as he can.
                
                   one of the best online
                
                   wrote the book, everything is clear, lots of work, but it can be done if you get organized, you will learn
                
                   Excellent instruction.  Syllabus is clear, and the timing of his feedback emails is remarkable.   Provides assignment templates and outlines. Always clear.  Took him for MGT 528 (Winter Mini Session) and full session MGT 527.
                
                   I have heard nothing but bad things about this guy.  From what I can tell so far, they are all true.
                
                   His classes are wonderful.  He was one of the best two or three professors at Commerce.
                
                   Very unfair policies that affect grades.
                
                   His classes are all on-line and very fast paced.
                
                   His classes are pretty tough but he is fair.  He and Carraher do a lot of work together.
                
                   His classes are VERY fast and can be difficult but are challenging.
                
                   Very good professor.
                
                   I don't know where these other people got the idea that Parnell is fair.  Not only is he not fair, he does not clearly state the requirements for his course.  Avoid if at all possible.
                
                   He is certainly tough but fair.  One of the best in the College.
                
                   Tough any time but fair.
                
                   Watch out taking him in a mini-term.  It is like sitting on a rocket going 400 miles per hour.  Good class but it is TOUGH.
                
                   4th best professor in college for good students.  Hard worker and serious classes.
                
                   Tough but fair.  Well worth taking if Carraher is too tough for you.
                
                   Great professor.  His class is challenging but I learned a lot.
                
                   Great professor.  He makes you work but it is worth it.  He and Carraher work well together with their classes supporting one another.
                
                   His classes are challenging and you actually learn something.  He is an exceptional academic.  It is too bad that we lost him
                
                   You'll work, but he's fair and accessible
                
                   Useless...completely useless. A truly horrible professor, and a blight on TAMUC. No guidance. No interaction. No support. I took the course online. No weblive lectures. No recorded lectures. No notes. I could have learned just as much by simply buying and reading the textbook. Class was a total waist of time. Pick ANY other available prof.
                
                   The worst instructor in 20 years! Very insensitive to students and for get about any communication with her. I think this may be a second job for her because she pays the students no-mind at all. For everyone taking this instructor, drop and take another instructor, any instructor! Good Luck!
                
                   This instructor is very insensitive to students and cares nothing about their enrichment. She gives no clarity on the assignments and is very rude. I had to drop this class due to family issues, and she was very rude to me and my situation. I will never take this instructor again!!!!!!!!!!
                
                   This was an online class.  The professor provided no feedback.  When asked to have the correct test answers to see what questions I got wrong, I was given no feedback.  The professor opens the week's PowerPoints only for that week and supplied no lectures at all.  There was no &quot;teaching going on at all.  No discussions, just textbook and quizes.
                
                   She was the worst prof I have ever had.  She provided no feedback for written papers and seemed to lash out at students when they provided her feedback.
                
                   I'm not sure this professor is qualified to teach, let alone teach research.  Her communications seem to be angry, lots of complaints about having 90 students to teach, and so we'd &quot;better not bother her.&quot;  I'm certain that I got a 0 because I didn't notice her instructions that we weren't to ask about grading, and I did 3 weeks after submission.
                
                   She is the WORST teacher!! I have made As on both tests, but I will likely fail her class. I am not sure why she is a professor. If you ask a question, don't expect a response. Don't expect any help because you won't get it. Don't expect clarification on directions because you won't get it! Expect nothing except failure!
                
                   It's too bad I'm limited to just 350 characters... This teacher is a detriment to the entire Texas A&M educational system and, in all honesty, severely compromises the school's reputation. She has no interest in helping students and has very ambiguous directions. Do not under ANY circumstance take this teacher.
                
                   Worst professor I've ever had. Don't expect any interaction with this one--It won't happen!! This professor seems as if she doens't have time for her students. She is VERY negative!
                
                   Old school teacher. Hillarious guy. Teaches Bus. Law and applies it to common scenarios. Has a JD from SMU so he knows the law. Tests are easy if you study. Not to big on showing up but DO NOT BE LATE YOU WILL HAVE A DOOR PUT IN YOUR FACE! Retiring after almost 40 years...you will be missed Sir.
                
                   Yeah. Did not like this man. Found him prejudiced. Why did this university had someone like him as head of finance department&#63;
                
                   It was amazing that a Head of Finance department would treat an international student like that. I handed him my syllabus for him to give me equivalent course credit. I wa stold to do so by registrar's office. Mr Hakala instead threw my syllabus on the floor and told me to leave. Only C in finance made in his course only hakalataught that course.
                
                   I went to Him for course credit as I was told to do so by ETSU registrar. He threw my syllabus pamphlet on the floor in front of me like trash and told me to get out of office. I made the only C in his course.
                
                   Be prepared to read the lectures and read the text book. Homework matters a lot. So try to get all homework correct and you have a good chance of getting A. Dr. Guru-Gharana is accessible via email and is very responsive.
                
                   HARDEST COURSE EVER! Math is not my thing but Dr. G was there to help. I cant say I passed with "flying colors" and I was stuck in my office for the ENTIRE 7 hours but I passed the course. Get ready to work hard and ask a lot of questions.
                
                   one of the best professors    the chapters and end of chapters test are important   test , midterm & final are a challenge but the professor will prep you as much as you allow   professor make use of email and will response to any questions within 24 hrs   the professor motivates & even though the material and course are tough it is possible
                
                   The professor was great.  Very helpful, always quick with email replies.  The material is VERY difficult but he explains things the best he can.
                
                   This is a difficult class and his notes are awkward. When students ask questions, his usual responses are, "I will let other students answer this and read my notes" which do not help much. He has snotty responses. A language barrier is present through his notes. There is no live lectures and the PPT slides are canned. Proceed with caution....
                
                   Excellent professor. I would recommend any one to definitely register his courses. His reading materials are top notch and trust me...they are very helpful and time savers. He is very quick in responding to your questions any time (Inc weekends). Overall, I am glad I took a tough course like Statistics with him as I learnt a lot.
                
                   Stats is never easy but he made it as painless as possible.  Used his notes to learn and not the book.  Very clear.  Do your assignments and don't get behind.  Tests are straightforward.  No surprises in the class!
                
                   Great professor. Very clear with instructions. Learn the assignments he gives and you will do fine on the exams. Very straight forward with o surprises.
                
                   Excellent tutor. Had a great time understanding concepts.
                
                   This is a very intense class; however Professor Guru-Gharana makes every effort to give bonus points along the way. The final is indeed 7 hours long. If I had to retake this course I would take him again without thinking.
                
                   Kishor Guru Gharana, you can not go wrong with this prof. his  chapter instructions are amazing and clear. His expections are clear. He really want you to learn. You got to show you willing to learn and do all the assigments you be fine. 7hrs exam solely based on core concepts of stat & his notes.His comments are meant to motivate you re-read Best
                
                   If you are a self-motivated and self-directed learner, then Kishor's class is perfect.  His chapter notes explain the material very well (I didn't need to open the textbook), and his assignments prepare you very well for the midterm and final.  Make good excel templates and keep them for future work!  If you are weak in stats/math, take 501 first.
                
                   I was very leary going into a Stats class. Dr. Guru-Gharana makes it seem easy. I will say it is very hard and a lot of work. If you do the very very best you can, you will do fine. He is the NICEST prof I have ever had. He is avail almost 24/7 for help. Answer EVERY question on exams (even with somthing) and you will do fine. I got a B.
                
                   I don't know what experience those had who are writing how great the prof is. My experience NOT being a math/acct major - a class of now help. Sure he's got open hours, but there's no lecture. It's a &quot;read my notes&quot; with snide remarks when you have questions. Second to worse class ever.
                
                   Dr. Guru-Gharana is a saint. He is one of the nicest, kindest and most helpful professors in this institution. I struggled with this class which is by far the hardest class in the MBA program. I almost dropped the class several times. I worked my tail off but Dr. Guru-Gharana got me through it and I passed his course with a B.
                
                   One of the best teachers at Commerce.  Would definately recommend you take this teacher for Stats. Pay special attention to his instructions and his assignments and you should do well on the Midterm and Final.  The time you put into studying for the exams shows in your grade. No surprises in the exams. Doesn't teach on one level and test on another
                
                   He is the most helpful professors I have ever had. I wish there were more professors like him. Its amazing how he responds to messages within a few hours and not days or weeks like other professors. do yourself a favor and take his class.
                
                   Unfortunately, there are no live lectures. Questions are submitted via discussion boards or email. Prof believes MBA students should seek further learning on their own. Heed his suggestion to search for stats resources online! I used videos from Jason Gibson & George T. Geis--along with simple Google searches, which helped immensly! SEARCH ENGINES!
                
                   This man is a saint.  I was failing at the mid term and he helped me.  I was in the final semester of my MBA program and was afraid that I wouldn't be able to graduate.  Dr. G. told me not to worry and to try to do better on the final.  I passed the class and worked my tail off.  Not an easy class.  Professor will work with you.
                
                   Took an online class with Guru-Gharana.  It is difficult to cram a semester's worth of work into five weeks (especially statistics) but he did a great job filling in the gaps.  He had his own helpful  instructions for each chapter, answered questions quickly, and graded assignments the next day.  He cares for his students and tries very hard.
                
                   Great Professor and very very helpful!
                
                   Tough material, but he was very helpful in responding to questions. Course requires student focus and attention. Curved grade at the end by shifting scale by 201000 points.
                
                   Dr Guru Gharana is extremely helpful. His way of teaching is really works. Four home work assignments and three tests. His notes are the best. You basically don't have to read the book as  he explains the chapters in a simplified manner. Do the home work , read his notes about three times before exams. and practice the examples.   
                
                   Very clear instructions and helpful. Do your homework and follow the guidelines you will be fine. Responds to your questions quickly and clarifies the doubts. Exams are similar to homework. Great professor, it is difficult subject but he made it easy, never expected an A, simply followed the directions. Very Nice professor, would take another class
                
                   Great teacher. Not easy, but makes the subject accessible and doesn't make it more difficult than it needs to be. He's not exactly patient with people asking repetitive or obvious questions. Make sure you read his notes and online discussions closely before asking questions. Stay up with the homework and read the notes and text and you will do fine
                
                   Four week Summer class. First class in MBA program and first online class. Dr Guru-Gharana made it relatively painless. Provided great notes that supplemented the textbook and gave homework assignments that reinforced everything. Like his teaching methods and style.  Will definitely look for him in the more advanced BA578 class.
                
                   Summer 1 2012. 4 assignments and a final exam for a total of 1000 pts overall. Notes are clear and concise, he grades quickly, and responds to e-mails immediately. He also curved exam grades which is the same format as the as the assignments (t/f, multiple choice. This was my first statistics class EVER and it was painless. I finished with a B
                
                   Mr. Guru-Gharana was able to easily explain the material, step by step, and with clarity.  I found his notes to the point and very useful. If I needed help, he responded within the hour, even when I emailed him late at night.  He is very personable, and I would definitely recommend professor Guru-Gharana to anybody!
                
                   Professor is extremely helpful and if you follow his notes, supplemented with the textbook you will do great.  It is hard to learn stats over the internet, but was made possible because the course material was laid out clearly and he was available for questions.
                
                   I found the online format and accelerated pace for this summer session class very compatible with my schedule. The professor provides quick responses to emails and his lecture notes were pretty clear. Note: the prof can come across as condescending or accusatory in his emails, but its no biggie if you focus on why you're taking the class.
                
                   Unfortunately, there are no live lectures. Questions are submitted via discussion boards or email. Prof believes MBA students should seek further learning on their own. Heed his suggestion to search for stats resources online! I used videos from Jason Gibson & George T. Geis--along with simple Google searches, which helped immensly! SEARCH ENGINES!
                
                   This man is a saint.  I was failing at the mid term and he helped me.  I was in the final semester of my MBA program and was afraid that I wouldn't be able to graduate.  Dr. G. told me not to worry and to try to do better on the final.  I passed the class and worked my tail off.  Not an easy class.  Professor will work with you.
                
                   Very helpful teacher! I took this class online and the professor was very responsive and always helped with concerns and questions. The book we used was confusing, but the prof has very helpful summaries. Do the quizzes from the book's website, they will help on the assignments and tests. Prof. also grades on a curve.
                
                   I earned an A in this course, but worked my a$$ off. Professor did not contribute much to my education. Refused to take my phone calls. Language barrier&#63; Very responsive via email but Stats was not my strenght and he pretty much forced us to learn on our own. Not the most polite person either. Not sure about others Profs, but think twice.
                
                   Great teacher. Does an excellent job of bringing along students who have limited stats exp.
                
                   I just took his Business Stat course online.  This prof. really cares about the learning process.  The assignments are designed to help you understand what you need to grasp to pass the exams.  He doesn't seem to enjoy tripping students up like some professors.  Just a great instructor and very reasonable with grading.  I highly recommend
                
                   Pro.Guru-Gharana is really the most helpful prof. I have seen. Always ready to help students.He has great teaching stlye and puts lots of efforts in teaching. He prepares his own notes which make the subject really easy to learn. His examples make it interesting.I would strongly recommend him for the stats class.
                
                   Great professor.  Ensures that every student understand the material. Uses his own instruction sets and questions for homework.  Uses homework assignments to prepare test. Be prepared to compelte HW assignments once a week.  Responds quicker than any other instructor that I have.  Very helpful and genuinely wants his students to succeed.
                
                   Great professor and interesting class. The projects were time consuming but there was always plenty of help available
                
                   Great teacher! She offers her help at all times and responds to email quick. TA are also available to help. She does offer extra credit opportunities. Overall great teacher.
                
                   If you enjoy listening to someone drone about a subject completely unrelated to the class material for hours on end, by all means take Norton. The tests were a mix of 8 FR and 7 MC (for the honors section) and his grading seemed to be very inconsistent. Although he purposely made the final easy, I wouldn't recommend this professor.
                
                   Class was very boring, but Norton knows what he is teaching and is willing to help out. The homework/project assignments are unclear at times, but he grades them pretty fairly. Also, tests are straight from the book mostly over big picture concepts. If you study and memorize the learning objectives and targets then the tests should go well.
                
                   The class was very boring.  Even though attendance isn't mandatory, he would frequently do RF Responder quizzes to keep people coming.  The class isn't too difficult, but his projects could be quite tedious.  If you fall asleep easily, you may want to avoid Norton.
                
                   awesome summer course. very clear and thorough... not so sure ab during the school year. heard he was difficult. but dont let a mere comment fool you. take the course @ your own risk. ***NORTON IS AWESOME, just get on his good side :) & of course study
                
                   lectures are extremely painful and Boring beyond belief.  He thinks very highly of himself- must be that baylor education.  Not helpfull.  tests are fairly easy-straight out of book.  as for the projects- subjectivity-better luck if you're a girl. the only reason people show up to class is to get credit for the cps questions. get him outta a&m
                
                   There are bettert eachers for info 210.
                
                   pretty good prof, follows the book and uses the book's powerpoint slides
                
                   Very very boring, but easy if you put some effort in outside of class.
                
                   Mr. Norton is a great professor but i agree with the previous comment that going to class wasn't always necessary. And also like the other comment the test can be really tricky even if you do know the material. The key to the class is making sure you do well on your database project.
                
                   You don't have to go to class, but unfortunately if you do go to every class like I did, it really won't affect your grade. The tests are a little tricky even if you know the material, but hey....he's a nice guy and looks just like Superman (no joke)!
                
                   He's clearly a nice guy who sincerely wants to help his students out, but I just didn't feel I really got much out of his class. His lectures have no clear running theme (and nothing to do with work assigned, for the most part) and students are left in the dark as to what he expects, which is made worse by really slow grading.
                
                   Small Group with 2 peer leaders has been my most influencial and best class of college so far, you meet with about 15 people and 2 peer leaders once a week
                
                   Johnson himself is a really cool guy. I didn't mind his lectures, but I thought they were pointless at times. You get split up into small groups that you're with all semester. We took a few hard quizzes but if you study you'll be fine. And then majority of your grade is a group project that takes all semester. Its rare to not end up with an A
                
                   Johnson's class was actually one of my favorite to go to this semester. He's a really genuine professor and cares about his students. I am sad that I didn't get to know him better as a professor so I'm taking another class he teaches this next semester. Teaches you a new way to think and look at things in life. Definitely would recommend.
                
                   Mr. Johnson's class was a favorite this semester. Though not structured, we did learn a lot of valuable knowledge that we can apply to the rest of our lives. This class was also a great way to meet friends as we meet in small groups every week. Overall his class was an interesting and motivating class that really helped my transition into college.
                
                   Johnson personally is a very sweet person that really cares for his students. However, the class itself was a huge waste of time. It is not as fun of a class as they made it out to be, nor is it as important. Lots of quizzes, long lectures, no exams, and one huge group project that took all semester. Didn't grade according to the syllabus either. 
                
                   Professor Johnson really cares for his students and is a very respectable man. His class (FBI) was my favorite class this semester because he made it bearable to sit through an hour and fifteen minute class. If you really apply what he teaches, it can be a very beneficial class for your time in and out of college. 
                
                   Huge waste of time, his lectures are random rants about absolutely nothing, he does not grade anything in a timely manner, and he did not follow his syllabus as far as points and assignments go. WOULD NOT RECOMMEND TO ANYONE. if you feel the need to take this class, take the other professor. but i would suggest not taking the class at all.
                
                   There is a big group project that takes up the whole semester that you have to do with little guidance. His lectures are frustrating because they has nothing to do with the class, they are really just his points of view on life, but you are forced to attend all classes or your grade will be affected.
                
                   Mr. Johnson is a good professor and the material in this class is not too hard. The lectures are kinda long and pretty off topic, but for the most part they are entertaining. The group project is the biggest grade in the class and you get assigned random group members. Attendance is rarely taken, but is pretty much mandatory to pass the class.
                
                   He is very big on understanding the frameworks. Doesn't cover the material on quizzes in class, thats up to you. Most of your grade will be a group project that involve a presentation at the end and you do not choose your group members. 
                
                   Johnson is a big fan of frameworks; so be sure to learn them! There is a semester long project that consumes all your time, so be prepared for that. He is not very organized and will post assignments at the last minute. If there is a quiz he will let you know the class before. There are no exams and your final is a presentation of your project. 
                
                   The group project is IMPORTANT. Before you start, try to apply the frameworks he gives you. That is what he really wants you to get out of the project It isn't about your project as much as it is about how your group came together and worked as a team, but try not to drop the ball on the project if you want an A. You will get out what you put in.
                
                   The business school really pushes students to take this class at the new student conference. This class teaches you about yourself and working in a group. Two things that a majority of people already know how to do. This course is actually a huge waste of time in my opinion along with many others I have talked to. 
                
                   I didn't like BUSN 101 - it felt like a huge waste of time and I was annoyed because they pushed it so much at the NSC. Lectures can be interesting but it's usually just talking about arbitrary frameworks and business models ... nothing super useful. Group project was okay; I loved my group! Easy A but don't take this class if you don't want to.
                
                   Quizzes at the beginning are tough. Lots of extra credit opportunities and he's willing to bump your grade up if he sees you put in effort. Big project at the end that is time consuming but not difficult. Much of the grade comes from "small group" where your group of about 10 students meets with your peer leader weekly. More social than work.
                
                   They push this course at you during the  NSC but it really wasn't that amazing. The best part was meeting a lot of people from Mays. Quizzes once a week for first month or so but he doesn't talk about the subject until after you take the quiz. Huge group project that lasted 1 12 months with 4 hr presentation. No final though!
                
                   Rough outline of Mr. Johnson's FBI: 1) "Frameworks" for thinking, decision-making, group work, leadership, etc. Difficult quizzes over them. __ 2) MBTI and personal strengths. __ 3) Advice on general businessy and school things from peer leaders. __ 4) A few reflection papers. __ 5) A long group project. ___ Course isn't as helpful as said in NSC.
                
                   Business 101 or Freshman Business Initiative is a pretty useless class. He gives quizzes at the beginning off the semester, but he doesn't tell you what you need to study. There's a group project that is a major portion of the grade. The lectures are on learning styles & personality types. This class does not give a good foundation for business.
                
                   Mr. Johnson ROCKS! BUSN101 is kind of an abnormal class, but Mr. Johnson makes it enjoyable and is very funny and relateable and tells lots of stories about his family. There are absolutely NO tests in this class, so the quizzes and assignments matter a lot
                
                   Ten years later and I still reflect on this professor's impact on my experience at TAMU.  I've been in IT consulting since I graduated working as a developer, business analyst, and PM and wouldn't be nearly as accomplished without Mike's guidance through this course, ideas on entrepreneurship, and commitment to his students.
                
                   If you want to know how to make your own site, start your own business, and learn about it from someone who has accomplished this task, then this is your guy.    He's not really that hot, but I'm a guy so what do I know, but I did see him working out all the time, so at least he's healthy girls.
                
                   Hnatt made himself available to his students via phone no matter how late we worked on projects and was willing ot meet in person to help in area where students were having problems.  Wish more professors has been like Mike.  His intro to Database Analysis and Design course did a great job of prepping me for the kind of work I got into after school unlike a lot of other courses in the MIS major (Yeah, I'm talking about that lame chick that taught COBOL... thanks for wasting my time/money).
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She's great!
                
                   This class went by fast.  But that's expected I guess in an 8 week course.  She was tough but had to be with the class to keep us on track.  I earned my B.  I would recomend her to students.
                
                   Very smart and knowledgeable. Tough but fair. And she was super freakin' hot! Her bf is a lucky guy.
                
                   Her syllabus was insane!  She thought she was teaching a master level class.  She expected a group research paper with more around 40 pages and a 30 minute presentation.  She did not cover the material well and was very unclear about what she expected.
                
                   I got an A in the class... but I am really good at math.  What kept my attention is that she always wore &quot;V&quot; necks and high heeled boots.  I never missed a class!
                
                   Bought the Textbook and we never opened it.  She was terrible and did not have a good grasp of the material.  She should learn stats before attempting to teach the subject!
                
                   SYLLABUS IS INSANE!  SHE TRIES TO ACT LIKE HER CLASS IS A MASTER'S LEVEL CLASS.
                
                   She did a very good job at teaching a pretty confusing subject!
                
                   Here two classes are two completely diff styles.  MGMT is laid back and you bring your experiences in to give examples of the terms and concepts.  Stats is a hard sub no matter who teachers it. She breaks it down and lets you call or meet with her for help. She is very nice, but you will work in both classes.  Most students think cuz she is nice sh
                
                   Very good teacher, take the class with her!!! You will understand what is going on.
                
                   She is a very flighty teacher. Her classes are easy but you don't learn much. Her business stat class is very easy only if you enjoy math. If you struggle in math she will confuse you more than she helps you. In her managment classes she is very knowledgeable.
                
                   He is a good professor. He has four exams in his class, but he drops your lowest one. He does the same thing with the six homework assignments. They're not tough if you study a lot. I passed with a B in his intermediate microeconomic class. This class is tough. We started out with 50+ and ended up with less than 20 at the end of he semester.
                
                   He is the worst professor any student can have. I am taking his online course and he never responds to emails. I will most likely end up with a B but I am 100 percent sure that if he was helpful and responded to student emails I would make an A.  
                
                   Read the text, figure it out for yourself, and take the trick exam.
                
                   Take his 6320 class in the summer. It's fast paced but easier.  Tests are pretty straight forward.  The 2 homework assignments were tough but not impossible.
                
                   Dr. Owens is one of those professors who you can tell knows plenty about the subject he teaches, but doesn't have the first clue as to how to teach.  Sadly, he's the only prof that seems to teach FIN6320.
                
                   Very tough class, homework sucks, tests are really hard and you have to basically teach yourself.  DONT TAKE ONLINE if you can avoid it.  He does grade fairly.
                
                   Great Lecturer, easy to listen to. Tests and assignments are extremely hard though so take with caution.
                
                   He is smart and knows what he is talking about. His tests in the other hand....
                
                   Casey Posey says if you don't want to learn anything and struggle to make a C, then I advise you to take this class.
                
                   He knows what he is talking about!
                
                   Excellent lecturer, brings current issues to class
                
                   Not recommended as an adviser at all! Not helpful at all! Prevented me from getting good grades, made it a whole lot more difficult for me to graduate in time. Why can I not vote a 0 for helpfulness?
                
                   Took the class online. Topics were interesting and the essays made you really understand the material. Not too fond of the essays being group work though.
                
                   A very easy way to get an A.  She's seems a little like an elementary school teacher at times, but she's a very sweet person.  I also had her as my advisor and she was great.  Very knowledgable and extrememly helpful.
                
                   Wasn't willing to have students come into the office for help.  The class was online and required a tremendous amount of writing.  I'm like the other student here who said, &quot;If you like to be talked down to, have fun&quot;.  She obviously does not want to be bothered with students who need help.
                
                   Good Teacher
                
                   If you like to be talked down to, enjoy!
                
                   Good class, learned a lot, but class was not unreasonably hard at least not compared to other classes.
                
                   Excellent professor that makes you learn and live the topic rather than just reading. Very helpful and cooperative.  Highly recommended. 
                
                   Great professor, if you do all you quizzes exam will be easy, he tries to make the material easy to understand, and will only teach you what is necessary in the real world.
                